


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











	Crowd Control Warehouse - Top Brand Name Retractable Belt Stanchions, Posts with Ropes, and Crowd Control Barriers direct at the lowest wholesale prices, most in stock for fast shipping.  Free shipping specials on several items!  Please browse our on
































































Retractable-Belt Barrier StanchionsWall Mounted BarriersStanchion Posts for RopesHanging Ropes Plastic Stanchions and ChainsStorage Carts for StanchionsPost Top Sign HoldersPortable Sign StandsPrinted Sign InsertsSteel BarricadesPlastic BarricadesExpanding Length BarricadesJersey and Road BarriersEvent Fence PanelsSportPanel PVC FencingNEW! Portable Safety ZoneNEW! Retracta-Cade BarrierBellman CartsBarrier Replacement PartsCustom Printing and Branding















					Your cart is empty.







































Shipping Costs/Times & Returns
Payment Options
Standard shipments are by UPS Ground or truck (depending on total weight).  To schedule an overnight or 2nd day air shipment, please contact us toll-free at 877-885-1600 to place your order!       Easy and secure online ordering!


Click HERE to LOGIN to your existing account or shopping cart.
We gladly accept purchase orders from schools, government agencies, museums, hospitals, casinos, arenas, theaters, sports franchises and more!
Click HERE to see our **ULTRA BUY** on 7.5 Ft., 10 Ft., and 12 Ft.  Retractable-Belt Barriers starting at only $38.95 each! 

Click HERE to see our **FREE SHIPPING SPECIALS**on Retractable-Belt Barriers and Steel Barricades ready to ship out immediately! 

Retractable-Belt Barrier Stanchions

Wall Mounted Barriers

Stanchion Posts for Hanging Ropes

Plastic Stanchion Posts and Chains

Hanging Ropes

Steel Barricades

 Expanding Length Steel and Plastic Barricades

Event Fence Panels

Post Top Sign Holders

Portable Sign Stands

SportPanel Outfield Fencing

Plastic Barricades

Storage Carts for Stanchions

Jersey and Roadway Barriers

NEW! Portable Safety Zone

NEW! Retracta-Cade Barrier




 
Crowd Control Warehouse is North America's #1 source since 2005 for Crowd Control, Public Guidance, and Safety products direct at wholesale pricing. As an Authorized Preferred Distributor for  Queue Solutions, Visiontron, and other top manufacturers, we work directly with the factories to bring you top-notch customer service, the fastest delivery, and the lowest pricing on our entire line of Crowd Control and Hospitality products. Please browse our online catalog of crowd control products, including Stanchions, Retractable Belt Barriers and Tensabarrier compatible products, Hanging Ropes, Plastic Stanchion Posts and Plastic Chains, Sign Stands and Frames, Barricades, Versa-Guard Expanding Barricades,  Bellman Carts, Jersey and Roadway Barriers, and much more!
 




 
We want and appreciate your business!  Unlike many of our competitors, we do not rely on gimmicks such as coupon codes or "holiday" sales, which force the customer to wait for a specific time or offer to get a better price, because we offer you the LOWEST PRICES that are DIRECT AT WHOLESALE, EVERY DAY, ALL THE TIME, with no coupons or gimmicks needed!  If you cannot find what you are looking for on our website, or are not satisfied with what you found, please contact us and let us know what we can do to help. Your satisfaction is our #1 goal!
 










 
      Crowd Control Warehouse • Phone (toll-free): 877-885-1600 • Fax: 847-991-9988
















	Wall Mounted Retractable Belt Barriers  - Fixed, Removable, Clamp, and Magnetic Mount



































































Retractable-Belt Barrier StanchionsWall Mounted BarriersStanchion Posts for RopesHanging Ropes Plastic Stanchions and ChainsStorage Carts for StanchionsPost Top Sign HoldersPortable Sign StandsPrinted Sign InsertsSteel BarricadesPlastic BarricadesExpanding Length BarricadesJersey and Road BarriersEvent Fence PanelsSportPanel PVC FencingNEW! Portable Safety ZoneNEW! Retracta-Cade BarrierBellman CartsBarrier Replacement PartsCustom Printing and Branding















					Your cart is empty.







































Shipping Costs/Times & Returns
Payment Options
Standard shipments are by UPS Ground or truck (depending on total weight).  To schedule an overnight or 2nd day air shipment, please contact us toll-free at 877-885-1600 to place your order!       Easy and secure online ordering!

Wall Mounted Barriers


Wall mounted retractable belt barriers direct at wholesale prices.  Fixed, Removable, Clamp, and Magnetic Mount.  We offer the highest-quality, most durable, and warranty protected products at unbeatable savings to you!Available in numerous different colors.  Click on each model to see all of the options!


Displaying products 1 - 25 of 25 results
Show: 

								30
							
								60
							
								90
							
								200
							

Sort: 

								Default
							
								Price Low to High
							
								Price High to Low
							
								Name (A-Z)
							
								Name (Z-A)
							
								Newest
							











WallMaster Fixed Mount, Removable Mount, Clamp Mount, or Recessed Retractable Belt Barrier with  10 Ft. Belt

Your Price: $47.95
















WallMaster Fixed Mount, Removable Mount, Clamp Mount, or Recessed Retractable Belt Barrier with 13 Ft. Belt

Your Price: $57.00
















WallPro 400 - 15 Ft. Fixed or Magnetic Wall Mount Retractable Belt Barrier - Tensabarrier 897 Compatible

Your Price: $65.00


















WallPro 450 - 20 Ft. Fixed or Magnetic Wall Mount Retractable Belt Barrier

Your Price: $80.00
















WallPro 450 - 25 Ft. Fixed or Magnetic Wall Mount Retractable Barrier - Tensabarrier 897HC Compatible

Your Price: $120.00
















WallPro 450 - 30 Ft. Fixed or Magnetic Wall Mount Retractable Belt Barrier - Tensabarrier 897EHC Compatible

Your Price: $140.00


















7.5 Ft. Fixed Wall Mount Retractable Belt Barrier - Tensabarrier 896 Compatible

Your Price: $62.00
















15 Ft. Removable Wall Mount Retractable Belt Barrier - Tensabarrier 897R Compatible

Your Price: $95.00
















25 Ft. Removable Wall Mount Retractable Belt Barrier - Tensabarrier 897HCR Compatible

Your Price: $152.00


















30 Ft. Removable Wall Mount Retractable Belt Barrier - Tensabarrier 897EHCR Compatible

Your Price: $172.00
















Visiontron 10 Ft. Fixed Wall Mount Retracta-Belt Barrier

Your Price: $59.00
















Visiontron 15 Ft. Fixed/Removable Wall Mount Retracta-Belt Barrier

Your Price: $69.00


















Visiontron 20 Ft. Fixed/Removable Wall Mount Retracta-Belt Barrier

Your Price: $79.00
















Visiontron 25 Ft. Fixed/Removable Wall Mount Retracta-Belt Barrier

Your Price: $104.00
















Visiontron 30 Ft. Fixed/Removable Wall Mount Retracta-Belt Barrier

Your Price: $125.00


















50 Ft. Fixed Wall Mount Manual Wind Retracta-Belt Barrier

Your Price: $289.00
















65 Ft. Fixed Wall Mount Retracta-Belt Barrier

Your Price: $499.00
















15 Ft.  Clamp Mount Retractable Barrier - Tensabarrier 897C Compatible

Your Price: $89.00


















25 Ft. Clamp Mount Retractable Belt Barrier - Tensabarrier 897HCC Compatible

Your Price: $142.00
















30 Ft. Clamp Mount Retractable Belt Barrier - Tensabarrier 897EHCC Compatible

Your Price: $162.00
















Standard Wall Mount Receiver for TensaBarrier Compatible Models

Your Price: $9.00




 


▪ Automatic locking feature▪ Used to connect belt ends to a wall▪ Made by Queue Solutions











Wall Mount Receiver for Visiontron Retracta-Belt Barriers

Your Price: $9.00




 











Wall Mount Receiver for 50 Ft. Manual Wind Retracta-Belt Barrier

Your Price: $14.00




 











Additional Easy Release Wall Plate for Removable Wall Mount - Tensabarrier Compatible

Your Price: $16.00




 


▪ Used to connect removable wall mount Tensabarriers to a wall ▪ Made by Queue Solutions











65 Ft. JetTrac Fixed Wall Mounted Retractable Belt Barrier

Your Price: $675.00
























 
      Crowd Control Warehouse • Phone (toll-free): 877-885-1600 • Fax: 847-991-9988














	Retractable Belt Barrier Stanchions
































































Retractable-Belt Barrier StanchionsWall Mounted BarriersStanchion Posts for RopesHanging Ropes Plastic Stanchions and ChainsStorage Carts for StanchionsPost Top Sign HoldersPortable Sign StandsPrinted Sign InsertsSteel BarricadesPlastic BarricadesExpanding Length BarricadesJersey and Road BarriersEvent Fence PanelsSportPanel PVC FencingNEW! Portable Safety ZoneNEW! Retracta-Cade BarrierBellman CartsBarrier Replacement PartsCustom Printing and Branding















					Your cart is empty.







































Shipping Costs/Times & Returns
Payment Options
Standard shipments are by UPS Ground or truck (depending on total weight).  To schedule an overnight or 2nd day air shipment, please contact us toll-free at 877-885-1600 to place your order!       Easy and secure online ordering!

Retractable-Belt Barrier Stanchions

When purchasing retractable-belt barriers, don't be fooled by other websites that sell only low-quality imitations of our products.  When you purchase from Crowd Control Warehouse, you get the highest-quality, most durable, and warranty protected products that are free of worries about toxic paints or dyes.





FREE SHIPPING SPECIALS


Click to see the Free Shipping Specials!





Low Cost, High Quality Retractable Belt Barrier Stanchions


Our most popular Ultra Buy Specials, QueueMaster, Que Style, and LineKing style models starting at only $38.95!  Perfect for basic, every day usage in most locations. Always in stock and ready to ship out immediately! Click to see the various choices.







Heavy Duty and Premium Quality Retractable Belt Barrier Stanchions


Heavy duty and premium quality QueuePro, Visiontron Retracta-Belt, Lavi Beltrac, and Tensabarrier Compatible retractable barriers for long lasting usage in high traffic areas.  Click to see the various choices!





TensaBarrier Compatible Retractable Belt Barrier Stanchions


High quality retractable barriers. Fully compatible and Spec Matched for Tensabarrier! Click to view available models.







Outdoor Rated Safety Retractable Barrier Stanchions


Specialized barriers for weather-safe outdoor use!  Click to view available models.





Retractable Barriers with Extra-Long Belts, Dual or Triple Belts, Mini-Height, or Other Specialties


Retractable belt barriers with Extra-Long Belts, Dual or Triple Belts, Mini-Sized Heights, or Other Specialty Posts.  Click to view available models.







Fixed and Removable Floor Mount Retractable Belt Barrier Stanchions


For permanent or removable floor mounting requirements! Click to view available models.





Cone Mounted Retractable Belt Barriers


Click to view available models.







Wall Mounted Retractable Barriers


Fixed, Removable, Clamp, and Magnetic Mounted Barriers to easily attach to your walls or racks.  Click to see the various models!
















 
      Crowd Control Warehouse • Phone (toll-free): 877-885-1600 • Fax: 847-991-9988



















Thomas R. Lawrence - Chairman & Chief Executive Officer at Aetos Technologies, Inc.



























































                      NEWS HOME
                    

Advertising
Board and Executive Moves
Energy
Health Care
Hedge Funds
M & A
Private Equity
Technology








            You have  
            
9 free profiles

              left this month   
			      

                Start Your Free Trial ➤
              








            Hey, we noticed you're a RelSci Pro subscriber! Would you like to view the page there?
            

                View on RelSci Pro ➤
              




























































































































Email







LinkedIn







Facebook







Google+







Tweet







Reddit





Permalink





Thomas R. Lawrence
Chairman & Chief Executive Officer at Aetos Technologies, Inc.



Overview
In The News Relationships Paths
Education Career History Boards & Committees Transactions 


Thomas R. Lawrence
Chairman & Chief Executive Officer at Aetos Technologies, Inc.



 Overview



Age



77
                                  (Born 1940)
                                              




Notable Companies


Delta Capital Partners Ltd.

Aetos Technologies, Inc.

Falcon Protein Products, Inc.




Board Seats



6





Number of Relationships



                This person is connected to 65 people.
              






 In The News
          See more




PR Newswire
June 10, 2016





                        Cumberland Pharmaceuticals Announces Caroline Young To Join Its Board Of Directors                    







 Relationships
              See Details




Samuel M. Lawrence

Chief Executive Officer & Director at CytoViva, Inc.




A. J. Kazimi

Founder at Cumberland Pharmaceuticals, Inc.





Arthur W. Doty

Director & Executive Vice President at Aetos Technologies, Inc.




John O. Lawrence

Chief Operating Officer & Director at CytoViva, Inc.





Charles T. Ludwig

Former Professional at General Electric Company




Will D. Carpenter

Director at Aetos Technologies, Inc.





Lawrence Watkins Greer

Founder at Greer Capital Advisors LLC




John C. H. Miller, Jr.

Member (Attorney) at Miller, Hamilton, Snider & Odom LLC





William W. Goodrich

Director at Aetos Technologies, Inc.




Ralph H. Zee

Associate Dean for Research at Auburn University - Samuel Ginn College of Engineering







See 55 more listings with RelSci Professional.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See 55 More 


 


 Paths to Thomas R. Lawrence



            Thomas R. Lawrence          




 You



 Connections via Relationship Science



 Thomas R. Lawrence






Sync your contacts to see how you can connect with Thomas R. Lawrence.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 


 Educational Background



 


Mississippi State University

                  Mississippi State University forms part of a cohesive town-university community with the growing agricultural-commercial-industrial town of Starkville. Located in the eastern part of north-central Mississippi, it is 125 miles northeast of Jackson and 23 miles west of Columbus; it is served by Highways 82,12 and 25 and by feeder air service through the Golden Triangle Regional Airport 14 miles east. Away from urban complexities, the community enjoys many intellectual, cultural, and recreational advantages: the MSU-Starkville Civic Symphony and Chorus; the Starkville Community Theater; the University Lyceum series, bringing professional musical, dramatic, and artistic groups and performers to the campus; art exhibits, plays, and recitals by local and visiting artists; public radio and public television programs through Mississippi Public Broadcasting performances by popular musical groups of regional and national celebrity; frequent intercollegiate athletic events in modern facilities; and a variety of recreational opportunities on playing fields and courts, in neighboring forests, fields, and lakes, and along the nearby Tennessee-Tombigbee Waterway. Mississippi State University is a comprehensive, doctoral-degree-granting university offering to a diverse and capable student body a wide range of opportunities and challenges for learning and growth; to the world of knowledge, vigorous and expanding contributions in research, discovery, and application; and to the State and its people in every region, a variety of expert services. Mississippi State University is designated as a Doctoral/Extensive institution by the Carnegie Foundation for the Advancement of Teaching. It is representative of the American Land-Grant tradition and distinctive in its own character and spirit, born of its Mississippi heritage and the vision and loyal perseverance of those who have labored in its development. Mississippi State University is accredited by the Southern Association of Colleges and Schools Commission on Colleges to award baccalaureate, masters, specialist, and doctorate degrees.                





 Career History



Chairman & Chief Executive Officer

                                    2003 - Current                


Aetos Technologies, Inc.


                  Aetos Technologies, Inc. is a technology development company. The firm offers funding and management services to commercialize and market technologies developed at research institutions. The company services include evaluation, product, process development, business management, and financing. Aetos Technologies was founded in 2003 and is headquartered in Auburn, AL.                




Founder

                                    Current                


Front Porch Press LLC






Managing Partner

                                    1989 - 1998                


Delta Capital Partners Ltd.






Chief Executive Officer

                                    Prior                


Falcon Protein Products, Inc.


                  Falcon Protein Products, Inc. provides rendering technology that delivers a protein fish product. It develops agricultural by-product value recovery system technology. The company was founded in May 2006 and is headquartered in Auburn, AL.                




Executive Officer

                                    Prior                


CytoViva, Inc.


                  CytoViva, Inc. provides optical microscopy-imaging systems. Its products include hyperspectral micropscopy, enhanced darkfield micropscopy and three dimensional enhanced darkfield microscopy. The company was founded by Samuel M. Lawrence and John O. Lawrence in 2005 and is headquartered in Auburn, AL.                




Professional

                                    Prior                


Union Planters Bank NA







 Boards & Committees



Corporate Boards ▾




Chairman & Chief Executive Officer

                    2003 - Current                  


Aetos Technologies, Inc.

                    Aetos Technologies, Inc. is a technology development company. The firm offers funding and management services to commercialize and market technologies developed at research institutions. The company services include evaluation, product, process development, business management, and financing. Aetos Technologies was founded in 2003 and is headquartered in Auburn, AL.                  




Director

                    Current                  


Cumberland Emerging Technologies, Inc.






Chairman & Chief Executive Officer

                    Current                  


Falcon Protein Products, Inc.

                    Falcon Protein Products, Inc. provides rendering technology that delivers a protein fish product. It develops agricultural by-product value recovery system technology. The company was founded in May 2006 and is headquartered in Auburn, AL.                  




Chairman

                    Current                  


Eagle Aquaculture, Inc.

                    Part of Aetos Technologies, Inc., Eagle Aquaculture, Inc. is an American company located in Auburn, AL. The firm engages in catfish production and farm raising.                  




Member, Board of Directors

                    1999 - 2017                  


Cumberland Pharmaceuticals, Inc.

                    Cumberland Pharmaceuticals, Inc. engages in the acquisition, development, and commercialization of branded prescription products. Its product brands include Acetadote, Caldolor, Kristalose, Omeclamox-Pak, Vaprisol, and Ethyol. The company was founded by A. J. Kazimi on January 6, 1999 and is headquartered in Nashville, TN.                  




Non-Executive Chairman

                    Prior                  


CytoViva, Inc.

                    CytoViva, Inc. provides optical microscopy-imaging systems. Its products include hyperspectral micropscopy, enhanced darkfield micropscopy and three dimensional enhanced darkfield microscopy. The company was founded by Samuel M. Lawrence and John O. Lawrence in 2005 and is headquartered in Auburn, AL.                  





 Transactions



 Details Hidden



                  CytoViva, Inc. raised money in a private placement transaction                                  




 Details Hidden



                  Falcon Protein Products, Inc. raised money in a private placement transaction                                  




 Details Hidden



                  CytoViva, Inc. raised money in a private placement transaction                                  





 Other Affiliations




              Thomas R. Lawrence is affiliated with
                            Aetos Technologies, Inc., Front Porch Press LLC, Delta Capital Partners Ltd., Falcon Protein Products, Inc., CytoViva, Inc., Union Planters Bank NA, Aetos Technologies, Inc., Cumberland Emerging Technologies, Inc., Falcon Protein Products, Inc., Eagle Aquaculture, Inc., Cumberland Pharmaceuticals, Inc., CytoViva, Inc..
            





You've reached your 10 free profiles limit this month.
Upgrade to RelSci Pro today to enjoy unlimited article views and much more!

Start My Free Trial  ➤

Still not convinced? Check out our full listing of features here.












Are you a RelSci Pro Subscriber?

Login to RelSci Pro 
                        ➤


Not a Pro Subscriber? Log in here to manage your alerts









 Keep me signed in.
        

Login  ➤



        Forgot your Password?
    

























 I have read the LexisNexis terms & conditions




Sign Me Up  ➤

















Lawrence, Thomas R Cpa | Indianapolis, IN - Macrae's Blue Book






















America's Original Industrial Directory Since 1893 

Login











Home
News



Advertise With Us

Ultimate Marketing Bundle
Industrial B2B Search Engine Rankings
Industrial Directory Advertising




Get Listed
Why Us?
About Us







Company / 
						Product/Service




 

Search













Is This Your Company?

Lawrence, Thomas R Cpa



Address:

6296 Rucker Rd # G
Indianapolis,  IN
,  46220-4852





Phone:
317-257-1540
Fax:
317-257-1544
Contact this Company


This company is located in the Eastern Time Zone and the office is currently
								Closed


Get a Free Quote from Lawrence, Thomas R Cpa and other companies


Click here and Select a Product...ACCOUNTING, AUDITING & BOOKEEPING






Lawrence, Thomas R Cpa Products:
Accounting/Auditing/Bookkeeping




Estimated Shipping Rates from 	Indianapolis, Indiana to

(Select State Below)
Alabama (AL) Alaska (AK) Arizona (AZ) Arkansas (AR) California (CA) Colorado (CO) Connecticut (CT) Delaware (DE) Florida (FL) Georgia (GA) Hawaii (HI) Idaho (ID) Illinois (IL) Indiana (IN) Iowa (IA) Kansas (KS) Kentucky (KY) Louisiana (LA) Maine (ME) Maryland (MD) Massachusetts (MA) Michigan (MI) Minnesota (MN) Mississippi (MS) Missouri (MO) Montana (MT) Nebraska (NE) Nevada (NV) New Hampshire (NH) New Jersey (NJ) New Mexico (NM) New York (NY) North Carolina (NC) North Dakota (ND) Ohio (OH) Oklahoma (OK) Oregon (OR) Pennsylvania (PA) Rhode Island (RI) South Carolina (SC) South Dakota (SD) Tennessee (TN) Texas (TX) Utah (UT) Vermont (VT) Virginia (VA) Washington (WA) West Virginia (WV) Wisconsin (WI) Wyoming (WY)


			These costs are an estimate and cannot be used as actual shipping costs. Please contact Lawrence, Thomas R Cpa for a complete quote with shipping costs.
			




Shipment Type
Estimated Price





Get a Free Quote from Lawrence, Thomas R Cpa and other companies


Click here and Select a Product...ACCOUNTING, AUDITING & BOOKEEPING









Additional Info for Lawrence, Thomas R Cpa



							Products - National
 

							Products - Local
 



Products offered by Lawrence, Thomas R Cpa


ACCOUNTING, AUDITING & BOOKEEPING



Products offered in Indiana


					ACCOUNTING, AUDITING & BOOKEEPING - serving Indiana 



  








Show All


Related Companies
					
					within
					
10 mi 20 mi 50 mi 100 mi 200 mi 500 mi


Relating Score



B

Dun Barr Cook & Shepard PC
2.0mi
6602 E 75th St Ste 400, Indianapolis
								

10


C

Cadick Williams Mc Allister
2.8mi
2905 E 46th St, Indianapolis
								

10


D

Accounting Services Group
3.2mi
8420 Masters Rd, Indianapolis
								

10


E

Defense Finance & Accounting
3.6mi
8899 E 56th St, Indianapolis
								

10


F

Rider Kenley & Assoc
4.2mi
9755 Randall Dr # 100, Indianapolis
								

10


G

Schafer , Lawrence & Utter
4.3mi
6905 E 96th St, Indianapolis
								

10


H

Pfeifer, Robert B Cpa
4.5mi
8329 N Park Ave, Indianapolis
								

10


I

Theracare
4.6mi
9957 Allisonville Rd, Fishers
								

10


J

Incredia Corp
5.4mi
450 E 96th St Ste 500, Indianapolis
								

10


K

L M Henderson & Co Llp
5.6mi
450 E 96th St # 200, Indianapolis
								

10


L

Allman & Co PC
5.6mi
9333 N Meridian St # 104, Indianapolis
								

10


M

Fiducial Business Ctr
6.4mi
6919 E 10th St # A2, Indianapolis
								

10












Services
About MacRAE's
Quick links
Local Search Partners
Industrial Partners


Advertise With Us
Get Listed
Contact MacRAE'S BLUE BOOK

About Us
FAQ's
Partners
News
Testimonials


Link To Us
Data Products
Terms and Conditions
Site Map


Profile Canada


Canadian Trade Index 


 

Browse by Company:  
		A-B 
		C-E 
		F-J 
		K-O 
		P-S 
		T-Z 
		
		                 
		Browse by Heading:  
		A-C  
		D-K  
		L-R  
		S-Z




			© 2017 MacRAE'S. All rights reserved
			
Like us -


|
Join us -


|
Follow us -
















 


Thomas R. Bundy, III - Lawrence & Bundy





































 Skip to primary navigation Skip to content Skip to footer
Click here for Mears Litigation



 
MENU 

Main navigationThomas R. Bundy, III
 
Thomas Bundy handles a variety of complex commercial litigation matters, including class and collective actions. Thomas regularly represents Fortune 500 companies across the country in numerous trials, arbitrations and alternative forms of dispute resolution. His practice spans the spectrum of litigation areas, including labor and employment, real estate, government contracts, privacy law, product liability and insurance coverage disputes.
While his practice is commercial in nature, Thomas focuses on traditional employment issues such as: civil rights litigation, including discrimination and harassment; wage and hour disputes; whistleblower claims; trade secret protections; Employee Retirement Income Security Act (ERISA) litigation; Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification (WARN) Act, Fair Labor Standards Act (FLSA) and Dodd-Frank compliance; and employment due diligence and audits. Thomas co-chairs Lawrence & Bundy’s Employment Group, which is at the forefront of defending employers against worker classification disputes, including federal and state wage and hour cases.
Direct Line: 240-786-4998
Fax: 240-786-4501
thomas.bundy@lawrencebundy.com
Download vCard for Thomas R. Bundy III

Education

J.D., Howard University School of Law, Member, Howard Law Journal, National Moot Court Team
B.S., Towson State University

Experience
Obtained summary judgment for a large international paper-manufacturing company in a case seeking in excess of $10 million for breach of contract and misappropriation of trade secrets.
Represented aviation publisher in air crash claims cases.
Handled ERISA litigation for Fortune 100 company.
Represented large county school system in multi-million dollar ERISA class action.
Represented call service client in wage and hour and WARN agency review.
Represented large radio station in school harassment claims.
Served as coordinating counsel for a large transportation company in misclassification actions brought by state agencies.
Defended a financial services company in an ongoing FLSA collective action filed by a former insurance adjuster who alleged that the company misclassified its adjusters as exempt, failing to pay overtime.
Represented a large energy company in an internal investigation and litigation of whistleblower and sex discrimination claims.
Defended a Fortune 100 company against state regulator claims of worker misclassification.
Represented a large insurance company in the Mid-Atlantic in employee benefits litigation under ERISA and state common laws.
Served as lead counsel for several Fortune 100 companies handling employee benefits litigation.
Awards and Rankings
Recipient, Outstanding Achievement Award, DC Diverse Partner Network
Recipient, Legal Elite Award, Washington SmartCEO Magazine
Recipient, Young Lawyer of the Year Award, Bar Association for the District of Columbia
Recipient, Star of the Quarter Award, American Bar Association, Young Lawyer Division
Recipient, Top DC Lawyer Award (“Young Gun” category), Washington Business Journal
Recipient, Disability Rights Section Award for Excellence, Washington Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights and Urban Affairs
Professional Activities
Founding Member, DC Bar Foundation’s Young Lawyers Network
Board Member, D.C. Board on Professional Responsibility
Board Member, Council for Court Excellence
Founding Member, DC Bar Foundation’s Young Lawyers Network
Former Fellow, Leadership Council on Legal Diversity
Chair, Hearing Committee, Board on Professional Responsibility for the District of Columbia
Former Chair, Young Lawyer Section, District of Columbia Bar
Former Chair, High-Tech Committee for the Labor and Employment Section, District of Columbia Bar
Former Chair, Host Committee, Young Lawyer Division’s Spring Conference, American Bar Association
Articles
Four Burning Questions about Medical Marijuana (July 2015)
Claims Magazine
Integrating the Cultures—and Employment Laws—of Your Multinational Workforce in the Global Economy (April 2015)
ACC Docket
BYOD and Social Media: An Employer’s Perspective (August 2014)
Financier Worldwide
Enforceability of Class Action Waivers in Employment Arbitration Agreements Post-Concepcion (Spring 2013)
Partnering Perspectives
‘Like’ It Or Not: Broker-Dealers And Social Media Access (June 28, 2012)
Law360
U.S. District Court Retroactively Applies Dodd-Frank Whistleblower Restriction to Bar Arbitration Provision in Employment Agreement (March 2011)
LexisNexis
Case Study: Arrigo V. Blue Fish (February 22, 2010)
Law360
Protecting the Contractor Model (Fall 2009)
Partnering Perspectives 
First 100 days and labor law (May 1, 2009)
Reprinted with permission from Daily Report
Lessons Learned From Worker Classification Cases (November 14, 2008)
Reprinted with permission Employment Law 360
Worker Misclassification: The Next Big Legal Concern? (Winter 2007)
Reprinted with permission from Employee Relations Law Journal, Wrights Reprints
Reviewing and Updating Your Employer Compliance Checklists (Spring 2013)
Partnering Perspectives
Presentations
Webinar: Top 10 Employer Resolutions for 2015 (February 19, 2015)
37th Annual Texas Banking Conference (March 2011)
Selecting and Utilizing Expert Witnesses (October 2010)
2nd Annual Council on Litigation Management Seminar in Bermuda
Protecting Your Confidential Information from Disclosure to Your Competitors (April 2009)
Texas Oil and Gas
DC Labor & Employment Law Section Seminars – The Internet, E-mail & Workplace Misconduct: Preventing and Litigating Harassment, Discrimination & Discipline Claims
DC Labor & Employment Law Section Seminars – Injunctive Relief in the High-Tech Era: Enforcing Non-Compete and Non-Disclosure Covenants
 
 
Footer
Sitemap, Disclaimer

Copyright © 2017 Lawrence & Bundy LLC. All rights reserved.
Website Design & Development by Graphic Beans






















Dr. Thomas R. Lawrence, Jr. Obituary | Star Tribune






















































  





















Continue to site
Snapshots

Star Tribune

A severe thunderstorm rolled past Lake Harriet towards downtown Minneapolis.
Photo: David Joles/Star Tribune


Buy Print
BUY




Twitter


Facebook


LinkedIn


Pinterest


SHARE


About
ABOUT






























































StarTribune


































Text size






comment9






share







tweet







email







Print





Dr. Thomas R. Lawrence, Jr.

Lawrence,  Dr. Thomas R., Jr. Almighty God, in his divine judgment called his servant Dr. Thomas R. Lawrence, Jr. to eternal rest. "Tommy", affectionately called by family members and friends, passed on Tuesday afternoon Nov. 10, 2015 at home in hospice care. He was married to Caroline Barbosa-Lawrence for 63 years and was the farther of four children: Lisa, Dwayne, Damon and Renee and the Papa and Grandpa of four grands: Caroline, Derrick, Alyssa and Morgan. The bother of Louise Jones and Reverend James E.F. Lawrence, presiding elder retired.Funeral services will be held at Saint George's Episcopal Church on Monday, November 16th, 2015 at 12 noon in Minneapolis, Minnesota. Expression, condolences and other thoughts of kindness may be sent to: Mrs. Caroline B Lawrence, 10541 Wyoming Avenue S. Bloomington, Minnesota 55438 Telephone: 1-952-941-5368. The family request in lieu of flowers that donations be made to the Thomas R. Lawrence Scholarship Fund c/o Krimson and Kream Foundation, 5413 Nicolet Ave South, P.O. Box 138, Minneapolis, Minnesota, 55419 Please keep us in prayer
Published on November 13, 2015


Guest Book









            Search Obituaries
            Advanced Search










Today
Last 3 days
Last 2 weeks
Last 30 days
Last 6 months
Last year
All Time (since 2001)



Search






Today’s Obituaries



Arnold R. Aasen


Eva M. (Reece) Arnett


Anne (Jasan) Barta


Willard H. Bergmann


Ralph C. Colby


Dorothy E. Crane


Larry Cummans


Becky Alvera Fahlgren


Mary Flanagan Nordlund


Dr. Donald L. Foss


Joan M. (Krebsbach) Gresser


Patricia Elizabeth (Costello) Hermes


Lillian Linnea (Anderson) Holm


Harlan J. Johnson


Jessica M. Johnson


Virginia Conati Johnson


Katherine 'Tottie' Lilly


Robert William Lodin


Angeline C. 'Angie' Mader


John A. Mara, Jr.


Dorothy Hall McFarland


Harriet C. (Lund Jodoin Moore Clyde) McGregor


Patricia 'Patty' Mulcahy


Darlene J. Nelson


Raymond R. Neumann


Gary A. Olson


Robert Leonard 'Bob' Pierce


Lorna F. Roehm


Mark Harris Saunders


Vincent Clarence Sikorski


Bernice A. Stuart


Thelma Urang


Duane Clarence Whittlef


Ronald R. 'Punky' Youngquist







Advice and Support


How to write an obituary 

How to submit an obituary 

How to plan a funeral 

How to write a eulogy 

How to get help with grief counseling 

How to deal with finances and more 



Related Resources


Funeral Home Directory 

Sign up for obituary alerts 

View In Memoriams 

Place an In Memoriam 





 















© 2017 StarTribune. All rights reserved.












Print Obituary
Do you want to include the guest book?
Yes
No
Cancel














































































Lawrence, Thomas R. | Obituaries | oanow.com





























You are the owner of this article.

 Edit Article
 Add New Article




































Welcome, Guest
Sign Up

                        Log In
                    





Dashboard
 Logout




My Account



My Account
 Dashboard
 Profile
 Saved items

 Logout










Subscribe
e-Edition
The Corner







                                Home
                            






                                News
                            



                                        Local
                                    


                                        Opinion
                                    


                                        Police Reports
                                    


                                        State News
                                    


                                        National News
                                    


                                        AP World News
                                    


                                        Political
                                    


                                        Milestones
                                    


                                        Weather
                                    


                                        Business
                                    





                                Sports
                            



                                        Auburn University
                                    


                                        High School
                                    


                                        Prep Blitz
                                    


                                        Recruiting
                                    


                                        University of Alabama
                                    


                                        College
                                    


                                        Barbasol Championship
                                    



                                Obituaries
                            






                                Events
                            



                                        Women's Expo
                                    


                                        Bridal Expo
                                    


                                        Home and Garden
                                    





                                Photos & Video
                            



                                        Photo Galleries
                                    


                                        Videos
                                    





                                Subscribe
                            



                                        All Access
                                    


                                        Mobile Apps
                                    


                                        Email Newsletters
                                    





                                Features
                            



                                        Columnists / Features
                                    


                                        Special Sections
                                    


                                        EAMC Health Updates
                                    


                                        Home Seeker
                                    



                                OWhataDealNow
                            




                                Ads
                            






                                Classifieds
                            



                                        Autos
                                    


                                        Real Estate
                                    


                                        Legals
                                    


                                        Pets
                                    


                                        Place an Ad
                                    


                                        Plaques
                                    


                                        Top Stuff
                                    


                                        Yard/Estate Sales
                                    





                                Jobs
                            



                                        Join Our Team
                                    






                                E-Edition
                            





















E-Edition


Manage Subscription


Place an Ad


Email Newsletters


The Corner


Subscribe






Sign Up

                        Log In
                    





Dashboard
  Logout







My Account
 Dashboard
 Profile
 Saved items

 Logout








































72°
Overcast 







 



                                
                                    Opelika, AL
                                
                                 (36804)

Today
Scattered thunderstorms. High 84F. Winds W at 5 to 10 mph. Chance of rain 50%..
Tonight
A stray shower or thunderstorm is possible early. Mostly cloudy skies this evening will become partly cloudy after midnight. Low 71F. Winds light and variable.
 Updated: July 25, 2017 @ 8:51 am



 Full Forecast




































Search






































Close

























































































        
        Lawrence, Thomas R.
    



Mar 27, 2017
 0








































































































1939-2017 Thomas R. "Tom" Lawrence of Opelika, Alabama passed away peacefully on March 22, 2017 at the age of 77 after a brief illness. Tom was born on September 6, 1939 in Dallas, Texas, served eight years (1955-1963) in the Mississippi and Alabama National Guard (E Company, 155th Infantry Regiment), and graduated from Mississippi State University, for which he had a lifelong passion. He had a long career in various entrepreneurial ventures where he either owned, founded or funded multiple businesses. Most recently he was the retired CEO of Aetos Technologies, Inc. and Board Chairman for Eagle Aquaculture, Inc. and CytoViva, Inc., all located in Auburn, Alabama and based on technologies developed at Auburn University. He was also a founder and Board Member of publicly traded Cumberland Pharmaceuticals, Inc. in Nashville, Tennessee. He has written several books based on his experiences growing up in the Mississippi Delta, his life-long affinity for Mississippi State University, and his experiences as an entrepreneur. Tom was preceded in death by his parents, Joseph O'Donovan Lawrence and Kathleen Lloyd Lawrence. Tom is survived by his partner, Clista Hunter Haley of Opelika, Alabama; children, Samuel Miller Lawrence (Terri) of Auburn, Alabama, John O'Donovan Lawrence (Ouida) of Auburn, Alabama, and Mary Lawrence Prater (Donnie) of Opelika, Alabama; step-children, Michael Hampton Fisher of Gallatin, Tennessee, Karen Fisher D'Hilly of Gallatin, Tennessee, and Scott Matthew Fisher of Opelika, Alabama; three granddaughters, Virginia Hobbs Lawrence, Ava O"Donovan Lawrence and Abby Barnett Lawrence all of Auburn, Alabama; grandson, Jackson Thomas Belford of Jackson, Wyoming; step-granddaughter, Molly Lauren Thorvilson and step-grandson, Dalton Thomas Thorvilson, both of Auburn, Alabama; and his brother, Steven Lloyd Lawrence of Memphis, Tennessee. The family will receive friends at Holy Trinity Episcopal Church, 100 Church Drive, Auburn, Alabama, Wednesday, March 29, 2017 from 1:00 pm until service time. A Service of Christian Burial will be held at Holy Trinity Episcopal Church, 100 Church Drive, Auburn, Alabama, Wednesday, March 29, 2017 at 2:00 p.m. with Reverend Geoff Evans officiating. In lieu of flowers, memorial gifts may be made to the Thomas Lawrence Endowed Scholarship Fund at Mississippi State University, MSU Foundation, P.O. Box 6149, Mississippi State, MS. 39762. Online donations may be made at msufoundation.com by designating your gift for the Thomas Lawrence Endowed Scholarship Fund. www.FrederickDean.com





































































Tags


Alabama


Thomas R. Lawrence


Economics


Commerce


Tennessee


Auburn


Company









×
Add an entry as 







Emoticons 


[smile]
[beam]
[wink]
[sad]
[cool]
[innocent]
[rolleyes]
[whistling]
[lol]
[huh]
[tongue]
[love]
[sleeping]
[yawn]
[unsure]
[angry]
[blink]
[crying]
[ohmy]
[scared]
[sleep]
[sneaky]
[tongue_smile]
[thumbdown]
[thumbup]
[censored]
[happybirthday]
[ban]
[spam]
[offtopic]
[batman]
[ninja]
[pirate]
[alien]



Comment Text





Cancel


Add entry













×
Report








Cancel


Report Abuse
















×

Watch the guestbook.
Stop watching this guestbook.








                            Get an email notification whenever someone signs the guestbook.
                        

                            Notifications from this guestbook will end.
                        



Cancel



Start watching
Stop watching












 (0) entries 
                            
                        





Sign the guestbook.


Log In



THANK YOU for helping us ensure that all guest book entries are
positive and considerate. If you see a negative or inappropriate
comment, please click on the link in the comment to report it, and
a staff member will follow up immediately.



Add an entry



Watch the guestbook.
Stop watching this guestbook.



















                
                Funeral Homes
                
            



























        

        
        Holloway Memorial Funeral Home



                                    	123 E Veterans Blvd, Auburn, AL 36830
                                    

                                The staff members of Holloway Memorial Funeral Home and Cremation will guide your family in creating a meaningful ceremony to honor the life a…
                                
                            














                
                National Obituaries
                
            



































    OANow.com, Opelika, AL © 2017 BH Media Group, Inc.
     | Terms of Use





























THOMAS R LAWRENCE - WARRINGTON, PA - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



PA



WARRINGTON



Business Services, Nec



Business Services At Non-commercial Site



                            THOMAS R LAWRENCE
                                    



 





















T 


THOMAS R LAWRENCE
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



1267 HORSESHOE RD WARRINGTON, PA 18976
Get Directions



(215) 343-5386





Business Info



 Founded 2009
 Incorporated 
 Annual Revenue $93,000.00
 Employee Count 2
 Industries Business Services At Non-commercial Site
 Contacts THOMAS R LAWRENCE







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


Since 2009, Thomas R Lawrence has been providing Business Services At Non-commercial Site from Warrington. Thomas R Lawrence has estimated annual revenues of $93,000.00 and also employs an estimated 2 employees. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







T

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.


















Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          








Thomas R Lawrence 的个人主页 | Facebook


Facebook邮箱或手机号密码忘记帐户？中文(简体)English (US)日本語한국어Français (France)Bahasa IndonesiaPolskiEspañolPortuguês (Brasil)DeutschItalianoMessengerFacebook Lite用户地点游戏位置名人二手市场小组食谱彩色气球Instagram公司简介创建广告创建主页开发者招聘信息隐私权政策Cookie广告选项条款设置活动日志 Facebook © 2017
















 







Biblical Theology in the Life of the Church (Foreword by Thomas R. Schreiner) | Lawrence, Michael                                                                                                                                                                                                                                              | LifeWay Christian Non-Fiction
























Menu


Search


Stores



Cart










Shop



Events



Ministry



Articles









Select a field to search: 
All
Title
Product #
Author


Search 
















eBook






Biblical Theology in the Life of the Church (Foreword by Thomas R. Schreiner) - eBook (eBook) 

A Guide for Ministry


Lawrence, Michael (Author)	
									        	
									           			, �
									        		
									        		Schreiner, Thomas R. (Foreword by)	
									        	
									





												File Type:
											 
											EPUB
										

Biblical theology is taken down from the shelves of misunderstanding and neglect and placed in pastors' hands as the practical, everyday tool it is.




$18.99





Quantity:



													Add to Cart
												








Description



Capitol Hill Baptist Church associate pastor Michael Lawrence contributes to the IXMarks series as he centers on the practical importance of biblical theology to ministry. He begins with an examination of a pastor's tools of the trade: exegesis and biblical and systematic theology. The book distinguishes between the power of narrative in biblical theology and the power of application in systematic theology, but also emphasizes the importance of their collaboration in ministry.
Having laid the foundation for pastoral ministry, Lawrence uses the three tools to build a biblical theology, telling the entire story of the Bible from five different angles. He puts biblical theology to work in four areas: counseling, missions, caring for the poor, and church/state relations. Rich in application and practical insight, this book will equip pastors and church leaders to think, preach, and do ministry through the framework of biblical theology.



Available Formats





															eBook, Non-Fiction
														
$18.99




																		Paperback, Reference Book
																	

$13.29









Specifications



Medium Format
eBook


Pages
240


Product Group
Books


Type
Non-Fiction


Publication Date
2010-04-01


Publisher
Crossway


Item Number
005589592


ISBN10
1433524635


ISBN13
9781433524639


Contributors

												Lawrence, Michael                                                                                                                                                                                                                                              (Author)
								    	    		
									           			, �
									           			Schreiner, Thomas R.                                                                                                                                                                                                                                           (Foreword by)
								    	    		
									   	    


Maximum Downloads
0


Maximum Devices
0









Biblical Theology in the Life of the Church (Foreword by Thomas R. Schreiner) - eBook (eBook)
Biblical theology is taken down from the shelves of misunderstanding and neglect and placed in pastors' hands as the practical, everyday tool it is.

$18.99






													View all 9Marks products and information.
												








Share

Facebook
Tweet This
Google+

Email to a Friend





   
Sign In / Register


Help & FAQ

Church Ordering




About UsContact UsPrivacy PolicyShipping RatesReturn Policy

� 2001–2016 LifeWay Christian Resources
View full site
 
   Payment Options: LifeWay Account, MasterCard, Visa, Discover and American Express LifeWay Accounts are for churches, ministries, and businesses only. Organizations having a not for profit status may also enjoy savings by not having to pay sales tax on qualifying products.   Your trusted source of Christian resources since 1891  










Thomas Lawrence - Wikipedia






















 






Thomas Lawrence

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For other people named Thomas Lawrence, see Thomas Lawrence (disambiguation).


Sir Thomas Lawrence



Thomas Lawrence, Self-portrait, 1788



Born
(1769-04-13)13 April 1769
Bristol, England


Died
7 January 1830(1830-01-07) (aged 60)
London, England


Nationality
English


Known for
Painting


Movement
Romanticism


Sir Thomas Lawrence PRA FRS (13 April 1769 – 7 January 1830) was a leading English portrait painter and the fourth president of the Royal Academy.
Lawrence was a child prodigy. He was born in Bristol and began drawing in Devizes, where his father was an innkeeper. At the age of ten, having moved to Bath, he was supporting his family with his pastel portraits. At eighteen he went to London and soon established his reputation as a portrait painter in oils, receiving his first royal commission, a portrait of Queen Charlotte, in 1790. He stayed at the top of his profession until his death, aged 60, in 1830.
Self-taught, he was a brilliant draughtsman and known for his gift of capturing a likeness, as well as his virtuoso handling of paint. He became an associate of the Royal Academy in 1791, a full member in 1794, and president in 1820. In 1810 he acquired the generous patronage of the Prince Regent, was sent abroad to paint portraits of allied leaders for the Waterloo chamber at Windsor Castle, and is particularly remembered as the Romantic portraitist of the Regency. Lawrence's love affairs were not happy (his tortuous relationships with Sally and Maria Siddons became the subject of several books) and, in spite of his success, he spent most of life deep in debt. He never married. At his death, Lawrence was the most fashionable portrait painter in Europe. His reputation waned during Victorian times, but has since been partially restored.



Contents


1 Biography

1.1 Childhood and early career
1.2 "Always in love and always in debt"[10]
1.3 "Pictorial chronicler of the Regency"[22]
1.4 President of the Royal Academy


2 Legacy
3 Gallery
4 See also
5 Notes
6 References
7 External links



Biography[edit]
Childhood and early career[edit]
Thomas Lawrence was born at 6 Redcross Street, Bristol, the youngest surviving child of Thomas Lawrence, a supervisor of excise, and Lucy Read, the daughter of a clergyman. The couple had 16 children but only five survived infancy: Lawrence's brother Andrew became a clergyman; William had a career in the army; sisters Lucy and Anne married a solicitor and a clergyman (Lawrence's nephews included Andrew Bloxam). Soon after Thomas was born his father decided to become an innkeeper and took over the White Lion Inn and next-door American Coffee House in Broad Street, Bristol. But the venture did not prosper and in 1773 Lawrence senior removed his family from Bristol and took over the tenancy of the Black Bear Inn in Devizes,[1] a favourite stopping place for the London gentry who were making their annual trip to take the waters at Bath.[2]
It was during the family's six-year stay at the Black Bear Inn that Lawrence senior began to make use of his son's precocious talents for drawing and reciting poetry. Visitors would be greeted with the words "Gentlemen, here's my son – will you have him recite from the poets, or take your portraits?" Among those who listened to a recitation from Tom, or Tommy as he was called, was the actor David Garrick.[3] Lawrence's formal schooling was limited to two years at The Fort, a school in Bristol, when he was aged six to eight, and a little tuition in French and Latin from a dissenting minister.[4] He also became accomplished in dancing, fencing, boxing and billiards.[5] By the age of ten his fame had spread sufficiently for him to receive a mention in Daines Barrington's Miscellanies as "without the most distant instruction from anyone, capable of copying historical pictures in a masterly style".[6] But once again Lawrence senior failed as a landlord and, in 1779, he was declared bankrupt and the family moved to Bath. From now on, Lawrence was to support his parents with the money he earned from his portraits.




An early pastel portrait


The family settled at 2 Alfred Street in Bath, and the young Lawrence established himself as a portraitist in pastels. The oval portraits, for which he was soon charging three guineas, were about 12 inches by 10 inches (30 by 25 centimetres), and usually portrayed a half-length. His sitters included the Duchess of Devonshire, Sarah Siddons, Sir Henry Harpur (of Calke Abbey, Derbyshire, who offered to send Lawrence to Italy – Lawrence senior refused to part with his son), Warren Hastings and Sir Elijah Impey.[7] Talented, charming and attractive (and surprisingly modest) Lawrence was popular with Bath residents and visitors: artists William Hoare and Mary Hartley gave him encouragement;[8] wealthy people allowed him to study their collections of paintings and Lawrence's drawing of a copy of Raphael's Transfiguration was awarded a silver-gilt palette and a prize of 5 guineas by the Society of Arts in London.[9]
"Always in love and always in debt"[10][edit]




Lawrence's first royal commission: Queen Charlotte


Sometime before his eighteenth birthday in 1787 Lawrence arrived in London, taking lodgings in Leicester Square, near to Joshua Reynolds' studio. He was introduced to Reynolds, who advised him to study nature, rather than the Old Masters. Lawrence set up a studio at 41 Jermyn Street and installed his parents in a house in Greek Street. He exhibited several works in the 1787 Royal Academy exhibition at Somerset House, and enrolled as a student at the Royal Academy but didn't stay long, abandoning the drawing of classical statues to concentrate on his portraiture. In the Royal Academy exhibition of 1788 Lawrence was represented by five portraits in pastels and one in oils, a medium he quickly mastered. Between 1787 and his death in 1830 he would miss only two of the annual exhibitions: once, 1809, in protest about the way his paintings had been displayed and once, in 1819, because he was abroad. In 1789 he exhibited 13 portraits, mostly in oil, including one of William Linley and one of Lady Cremorne, his first attempt at a full-length portrait.[11] The paintings received favourable comments in the press with one critic referring to him as "the Sir Joshua of futurity not far off" and, aged just twenty, Lawrence received his first royal commission, a summons arriving from Windsor Palace to paint the portraits of Queen Charlotte and Princess Amelia.[12] The queen found Lawrence presumptuous (although he made a good impression on the princesses and ladies-in-waiting) and she didn't like the finished portrait, which remained in Lawrence's studio until his death. When it was exhibited at the Royal Academy in 1790, however, it received critical acclaim.[13] Also shown that year was another of Lawrence's most famous portraits, that of the actress Elizabeth Farren, soon to be the Countess of Derby, "completely Elizabeth Farren: arch, spirited, elegant and engaging", according to one newspaper.[14]




Lawrence exhibited in 40 Royal Academy annual exhibitions


In 1791 Lawrence was elected an associate of the Royal Academy and the following year, on the death of Sir Joshua Reynolds, King George III appointed him "painter-in-ordinary to his majesty". His reputation was established, and he moved to a studio in Old Bond Street. In 1794 he became a full member of the Royal Academy.[15] Although commissions were pouring in, Lawrence was in financial difficulties. His debts would stay with him for the rest of life: he narrowly avoided bankruptcy and had to be bailed out by wealthy sitters and friends, and died insolvent. Biographers have never been able to discover the source of his debts; he was a prodigiously hard worker (once referring in a letter to his portrait painting as "mill-horse business")[16] and didn't appear to live extravagantly. Lawrence himself said: "I have never been extravagant nor profligate in the use of money. Neither gaming, horses, curricles, expensive entertainments, nor secret sources of ruin from vulgar licentiousness have swept it from me".[17] This has generally been accepted, with biographers blaming his financial problems on his generosity towards his family and others, his inability to keep accounts (in spite of advice from his friend the painter and diarist Joseph Farington), and his magnificent but costly collection of Old Master drawings.




Lawrence was in love with Sarah Siddons's daughter Sally. Painting by Thomas Lawrence, eighteenth century.


Another source of unhappiness in Lawrence's life was his romantic entanglement with two of Sarah Siddons' daughters. He fell in love first with Sally, then transferred his affections on to her sister Maria, then broke with Maria and turned to Sally again. Both the sisters had fragile health; Maria died in 1798, on her deathbed extracting a promise from her sister never to marry Lawrence. Sally kept her promise and refused to see Lawrence again, dying in 1803. But Lawrence continued on friendly terms with their mother and painted several portraits of her. He never married. In later years two women would provide him with companionship, friends Elizabeth Croft and Isabella Wolff who first met Lawrence when she sat for her portrait in 1803. Isabella was married to the Danish consul Jens Wolff, but she separated from him in 1810, and Sir Michael Levey suggests that people may have wondered if Lawrence was the father of her son Herman.[18]
Lawrence's departures from portraiture were very rare. In the early 1790s he completed two history pictures: Homer reciting his poems, a small picture of the poet in a pastoral setting; and Satan summoning his legions, a giant canvas to illustrate lines from John Milton's Paradise Lost.[19] The boxer John Jackson posed for the naked body of Satan; the face is that of Sarah Siddons' brother, John Philip Kemble.[20]




Portrait of Henry Dundas


Lawrence's parents died within a few months of each other in 1797 and he gave up his house in Picadilly, where he had moved from Old Bond Street, to set up his studio in the family home in Greek Street. By now, to keep up with the demand for replicas of his portraits, he was making use of studio assistants, most notable of whom would be William Etty and George Henry Harlow. The early years of the nineteenth century saw Lawrence's portrait practice continue to flourish: amongst his sitters were major political figures such as Henry Dundas, 1st Viscount Melville and William Lamb, 2nd Viscount Melbourne, whose wife Lady Caroline Lamb was also painted by Lawrence. The king commissioned portraits of his daughter-in-law Caroline, the estranged wife of the Prince of Wales, and his granddaughter Charlotte. Lawrence stayed at the Montague House, the residence of the princess in Blackheath, while he was painting the portraits and thus became implicated in the "delicate investigation" into Caroline's morals. He swore an affidavit that although he had on occasion been alone with the princess, the door had never been locked or bolted and he had "not the least objection for all the world to have heard or seen what took place".[21] Expertly defended by Spencer Perceval, he was exonerated.
"Pictorial chronicler of the Regency"[22][edit]




The Duke of Wellington in 1814


By the time the Prince of Wales was made regent in 1814, Lawrence was acknowledged as the foremost portrait painter in the country. Through one of his sitters, Lord Charles Stewart, he met the Prince Regent who was to become his most important patron. As well as portraits of himself, the prince commissioned portraits of allied leaders: the Duke of Wellington, Field-Marshal von Blücher and Count Platov sat for Lawrence at his new house at 65 Russell Square. The house was demolished in the early 20th century to make way for the Imperial Hotel. The private sitting-room of Sir Thomas Lawrence[23] shows Lawrence at 65 Russell Square, surrounded by casts of classical sculpture. The prince also had plans for Lawrence to travel abroad and paint foreign royalty and leaders, and as a preliminary he was given a knighthood on 22 April 1815. Napoleon's return from Elba put these plans on hold, although Lawrence did make a visit to Paris, where his friend Lord Charles Stewart was ambassador, and saw the art that Napoleon had looted from Italy, including Raphael's Transfiguration, the painting he had reproduced for his silver-gilt palette as a boy.[24]




Lawrence painted Pope Pius VII in Rome in 1819


In 1817 the prince commissioned Lawrence to paint a portrait of his daughter Princess Charlotte, who was pregnant with her first child. Charlotte died in childbirth; Lawrence completed the portrait and presented it to her husband Prince Leopold at Claremont on his birthday, as agreed. The princess's obstetrician, Sir Richard Croft, who later shot himself, was the half-brother of Lawrence's friend, Elizabeth Croft, and for her Lawrence drew a sketch of Croft in his coffin.[25]
Eventually, in September 1818, Lawrence was able to make his postponed trip to the continent to paint the allied leaders, first at Aachen and then at the conference of Vienna, for what would become the Waterloo Chamber series, housed in Windsor Castle. His sitters included Tsar Alexander, Emperor Francis I of Austria, the King of Prussia, Field-Marshal Prince Schwarzenberg, Archduke Charles of Austria and Henriette his wife, and a young Napoleon II, as well as various French and Prussian ministers. In May 1819, still under orders from the Prince Regent, he left Vienna for Rome to paint Pope Pius VII and Cardinal Consalvi.[26]
President of the Royal Academy[edit]




Anne, Viscountess Pollington, later Countess of Mexborough (d. 1870), with her son, John Charles, later 4th Earl of Mexborough London, Moretti Fine Art collection


Lawrence arrived back in London 30 March 1820 to find that the president of the Royal Academy, Benjamin West, had died. That very evening Lawrence was voted the new president, a position he would hold until his death 10 years later. George III had died in January; Lawrence was granted a place in the procession for the coronation of George IV. On 28 February 1822 he was elected as a Fellow of the Royal Society "for his eminence in art".[27] The royal commissions continued during the 1820s, including one for a portrait of the king's sister Sophia, and one of Sir Walter Scott (along with Jane Austen, one of Lawrence's favourite authors), as well as one to paint King Charles X of France for the Waterloo series, for which Lawrence made a trip to Paris, taking Herman Wolff with him.[28] Lawrence acquired another important patron in Robert Peel, who commissioned the painter to do portraits of his family as well a portrait of George Canning. Two of Lawrence's most famous portraits of children were painted during the 1820s: that of Emily and Laura Calmady and that of Master Charles William Lambton, painted for his father Lord Durham for 600 guineas and known as The Red Boy. The latter portrait attracted much praise when it was exhibited in Paris in 1827.[29] One of the artist's last commissions was of future prime-minister the Earl of Aberdeen. Fanny Kemble, a niece of Sarah Siddons, was one of his last sitters (for a drawing).
Lawrence died suddenly on 7 January 1830, just months after his friend Isabella Wolff. A few days previously he had experienced chest pains but had continued working and was eagerly anticipating a stay with his sister at Rugby, when he collapsed and died during a visit from his friends Elizabeth Croft and Archibald Keightley.[30] After a post-mortem examination, doctors concluded that the artist's death had been caused by ossification of the aorta and vessels of the heart. Lawrence's first biographer, D. E. Williams suggested that this in itself was not enough to cause death and it was his doctors' over-zealous bleeding and leeching that killed him.[31] Lawrence was buried on 21 January in the crypt of St Paul's Cathedral. Amongst the mourners was J. M. W. Turner who painted a sketch of the funeral from memory.[32] Turner's painting of Lawrence's funeral is in the Tate Gallery.




A bust of Thomas Lawrence by Edward Hodges Baily, 1830


Lawrence was famed for the length of time he took to finish some of his paintings (Isabella Wolff waited twelve years for her portrait to be completed) and, at his death, his studio contained a large number of unfinished works. Some were completed by his assistants and other artists, some were sold as they were. In his will Lawrence left instructions to offer, at a price much below their worth, his collection of Old Master drawings to first George IV, then the trustees of the British Museum, then Robert Peel and the Earl of Dudley. None of them accepted the offer and the collection was split up and auctioned; many of the drawings later found their way into the British Museum and the Ashmolean Museum.[33] After Lawrence's creditors had been paid, there was no money left, although a memorial exhibition at the British Institution raised £3,000 which was given to his nieces.[34]
Legacy[edit]




Elizabeth Farren's portrait went to the United States


Lawrence's friends asked the Scottish poet Thomas Campbell to write the artist's biography, but he passed the task on to D.E. Williams whose two rather inaccurate volumes were published in 1831.[35] It would be nearly 70 years later, in 1900, before another biography of Lawrence appeared, this time by Lord Ronald Gower. In 1913 Sir Walter Armstrong, who was not a great admirer of Lawrence, published a monograph. The 1950s saw the publication of two further works: Douglas Goldring's Regency portrait painter, and Kenneth Garlick's catalogue of Lawrence's paintings (a further edition was published in 1989). Sir Michael Levey, curator of the National Portrait Gallery's 1979–80 Lawrence exhibition, produced books on the artist in 1979 and 2005. Lawrence's entanglements with the Siddons family has been the subject of three books (by Oswald Knapp, André Maurois, and Naomi Royde-Smith) and a recent radio play.
Lawrence's reputation as an artist fell during the Victorian era. Critic and artist Roger Fry did something to restore it in the 1930s, when he described Lawrence as having a "consummate mastery over the means of artistic expression" with an "unerring hand and eye".[36] At one time Lawrence was more popular in the United States and France than he was in Britain, and some of his best known portraits, including those of Elizabeth Farren, Sarah Barrett Moulton (known to her family as Pinkie), and Charles Lambton (the "Red Boy") found their way to the United States during the early 20th century enthusiasm there for English portraits. Sir Michael Levey acknowledges that Lawrence is still dismissed by some art historians; his explanation is that "He was a highly original artist, quite unexpected on the English scene: self-taught, self-absorbed in perfecting his own personal style, and in effect self-destructing, since he left behind no significant followers or creative influence. Leaving aside Sargent, his sole successor has been not in painting, but in fashionable, virtuoso photography."[37]
The most extensive collections of Lawrence's work can be found in the Royal Collections[38] and the National Portrait Gallery in London.[39] The Tate Britain, the National Gallery and the Dulwich Picture Gallery house smaller collections of his work in London. There are a few examples of his work in the Holburne Museum of Art and the Victoria Art Gallery in Bath, and in Bristol City Museum and Art Gallery. In the United States, The Huntington Library houses Pinkie, and Lawrence's portraits of Elizabeth Farren, Lady Harriet Maria Conyngham, and the Calmady children are in the Metropolitan Museum of Art. In Europe, the Musée du Louvre has a few example's of Lawrence's work, and the Vatican Pinacoteca has a swagger portrait of George IV (presented by the king himself) as almost its only British work.
In 2010 the National Portrait Gallery held a retrospective exhibition of Lawrence's work. The director of the National Portrait Gallery, Sandy Nairne, was quoted in the Guardian describing Lawrence as: "a huge figure. But a huge figure who we believe deserves a great deal more attention. He is one of the great painters of the last 250 years and one of the great stars of portraiture on a European stage."[40]
Gallery[edit]







Alexander MacKenzie, (c.1800-1801), National Gallery of Canada









Portrait of the Honorable Mrs. Seymour Bathurst, 1828, Dallas Museum of Art









Lord Seaforth, (c.1805), Figge Art Museum, Davenport, USA









Portrait of Marguerite, Countess of Blessington, 1822, Wallace Collection, London









King George IV's coronation









Francis Humberstone MacKenzie of the 78th Highlanders









Maria, wife of Sir William Oglander, 6th Baronet









Arthur Wellesley, 1st Duke of Wellington









The Children of Ayscoghe Boucherett









Queen Maria II of Portugal









Jacome Ratton, Museu Nacional de Arte Antiga









Miss Marthe Carr (Museo del Prado)









George Hibbert









Lady Maria Conyngham, 1824–25




See also[edit]

English school of painting

Notes[edit]


^ The Black Bear is still a hotel
^ Goldring 1951: 28
^ Goldring 1951: 35
^ Goldring 1951: 29
^ Annual Review 1830
^ Goldring 1951: 40
^ Levey 2005: 49–59
^ Levey 2005: 43
^ Levey 2005: 56
^ L.J. Jennings 1885 The Croker papers, vol 2: 297
^ Levey 2005: 77–79
^ Levey 2005: 76–77
^ Levey 2005: 85–90
^ Levey 2005: 92
^ Lawrence is shown second from left seated (number 6) in Henry Singleton's The Royal Academicians in General Assembly, 1795
^ Levey 2005: 137
^ Lawrence, Sir Thomas Dictionary of national biography, vol. 32, 1892: 278–285
^ Levey 2005: 194, 263
^ Royal Academy of the Arts Collections artist of the month: Sir Thomas Lawrence features Satan summoning his legions
^ Goldring 1951: 110
^ Goldring 1951: 213–219
^ Levey 2005: 171
^ "National Portrait Gallery - Large Image - NPG D37049; The Private Sitting Room of Sir Thomas Lawrence". npg.org.uk. 
^ Levey 2005: 198
^ Levey 2005: 201–3
^ Levey 2005: 207–238
^ "Library and Archive Catalog: Lawrence, Sir Thomas (1769–1830)". London: The Royal Society. Retrieved 6 July 2010. 
^ Levey 2005: 263
^ Levey 2005: 249–258
^ Levey 2005: 296–99
^ Goldring 1951: 330
^ "'Funeral of Sir Thomas Lawrence: A Sketch from Memory', Joseph Mallord William Turner - Tate". Tate. 
^ Goldring 1951: 335–342
^ Levey 2005: 306
^ Levey 2005: 302–3
^ Roger Fry (Reflections on British Painting, 1934) quoted in Levey 2005: 309
^ Levey 2005: 312–13
^ "The Collection". royalcollection.org.uk. 
^ "National Portrait Gallery - Person - Sir Thomas Lawrence". npg.org.uk. 
^ Brown, Mark (4 August 2010). "National Portrait Gallery shines light on forgotten artist Thomas Lawrence". The Guardian. Retrieved 24 April 2014. 


References[edit]

D Goldring 1951 Regency portrait painter: the life of Sir Thomas Lawrence, P.R.A. London: Macdonald
M Levey 2005 Sir Thomas Lawrence. New Haven and London: Yale University Press

External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Thomas Lawrence.



Thomas Lawrence: Regency Power and Brilliance exhibition at the National Portrait Gallery
Thomas Lawrence exhibition catalogs
"Gainsborough's forgotten rival is recognised at last" Jerome Taylor, The Independent, 5 August 2010
"Thomas Lawrence: the new romantic – review" Richard Holmes reviews the National Portrait Gallery exhibition, The Guardian, 16 October 2010
337 Painting(s) by or after Thomas Lawrence at the Art UK site



Court offices


Preceded by
Sir Joshua Reynolds
Principal Painter in Ordinary to the King
1792–1830
Succeeded by
David Wilkie


Cultural offices


Preceded by
Benjamin West
President of the Royal Academy
1820–1830
Succeeded by
Martin Archer Shee





Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 59122598
LCCN: n81008170
ISNI: 0000 0001 1473 2825
GND: 118778994
SELIBR: 268581
SUDOC: 030083478
BNF: cb121571118 (data)
ULAN: 500022619
NLA: 35281740
NKC: xx0132678
BNE: XX995063
RKD: 48440










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Thomas_Lawrence&oldid=790099206"					
Categories: 1769 births1830 deaths18th-century English paintersEnglish male painters19th-century English paintersArtists from BristolEnglish romantic paintersEnglish portrait paintersFellows of the Royal SocietyMembers of The ClubPrincipal Painters in OrdinaryRoyal AcademiciansKnights BachelorHonorary titles of the United KingdomFellows of the Royal Society (Statute 12)Hidden categories: EngvarB from October 2013Use dmy dates from October 2013Articles with hCardsPages using infobox artist with unknown parametersWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiersWikipedia articles with SELIBR identifiersWikipedia articles with BNF identifiersWikipedia articles with ULAN identifiersWikipedia articles with NLA identifiersWikipedia articles with RKDartists identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


العربيةAragonésCatalàČeštinaDanskDeutschΕλληνικάEspañolEsperantoفارسیFrançaisIdoItalianoעבריתLietuviųMagyarNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålNorsk nynorskPolskiPortuguêsРусскийSimple EnglishSuomiSvenskaไทยУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 11 July 2017, at 16:16.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Thomas Lawrence - Wikipedia






















 






Thomas Lawrence

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For other people named Thomas Lawrence, see Thomas Lawrence (disambiguation).


Sir Thomas Lawrence



Thomas Lawrence, Self-portrait, 1788



Born
(1769-04-13)13 April 1769
Bristol, England


Died
7 January 1830(1830-01-07) (aged 60)
London, England


Nationality
English


Known for
Painting


Movement
Romanticism


Sir Thomas Lawrence PRA FRS (13 April 1769 – 7 January 1830) was a leading English portrait painter and the fourth president of the Royal Academy.
Lawrence was a child prodigy. He was born in Bristol and began drawing in Devizes, where his father was an innkeeper. At the age of ten, having moved to Bath, he was supporting his family with his pastel portraits. At eighteen he went to London and soon established his reputation as a portrait painter in oils, receiving his first royal commission, a portrait of Queen Charlotte, in 1790. He stayed at the top of his profession until his death, aged 60, in 1830.
Self-taught, he was a brilliant draughtsman and known for his gift of capturing a likeness, as well as his virtuoso handling of paint. He became an associate of the Royal Academy in 1791, a full member in 1794, and president in 1820. In 1810 he acquired the generous patronage of the Prince Regent, was sent abroad to paint portraits of allied leaders for the Waterloo chamber at Windsor Castle, and is particularly remembered as the Romantic portraitist of the Regency. Lawrence's love affairs were not happy (his tortuous relationships with Sally and Maria Siddons became the subject of several books) and, in spite of his success, he spent most of life deep in debt. He never married. At his death, Lawrence was the most fashionable portrait painter in Europe. His reputation waned during Victorian times, but has since been partially restored.



Contents


1 Biography

1.1 Childhood and early career
1.2 "Always in love and always in debt"[10]
1.3 "Pictorial chronicler of the Regency"[22]
1.4 President of the Royal Academy


2 Legacy
3 Gallery
4 See also
5 Notes
6 References
7 External links



Biography[edit]
Childhood and early career[edit]
Thomas Lawrence was born at 6 Redcross Street, Bristol, the youngest surviving child of Thomas Lawrence, a supervisor of excise, and Lucy Read, the daughter of a clergyman. The couple had 16 children but only five survived infancy: Lawrence's brother Andrew became a clergyman; William had a career in the army; sisters Lucy and Anne married a solicitor and a clergyman (Lawrence's nephews included Andrew Bloxam). Soon after Thomas was born his father decided to become an innkeeper and took over the White Lion Inn and next-door American Coffee House in Broad Street, Bristol. But the venture did not prosper and in 1773 Lawrence senior removed his family from Bristol and took over the tenancy of the Black Bear Inn in Devizes,[1] a favourite stopping place for the London gentry who were making their annual trip to take the waters at Bath.[2]
It was during the family's six-year stay at the Black Bear Inn that Lawrence senior began to make use of his son's precocious talents for drawing and reciting poetry. Visitors would be greeted with the words "Gentlemen, here's my son – will you have him recite from the poets, or take your portraits?" Among those who listened to a recitation from Tom, or Tommy as he was called, was the actor David Garrick.[3] Lawrence's formal schooling was limited to two years at The Fort, a school in Bristol, when he was aged six to eight, and a little tuition in French and Latin from a dissenting minister.[4] He also became accomplished in dancing, fencing, boxing and billiards.[5] By the age of ten his fame had spread sufficiently for him to receive a mention in Daines Barrington's Miscellanies as "without the most distant instruction from anyone, capable of copying historical pictures in a masterly style".[6] But once again Lawrence senior failed as a landlord and, in 1779, he was declared bankrupt and the family moved to Bath. From now on, Lawrence was to support his parents with the money he earned from his portraits.




An early pastel portrait


The family settled at 2 Alfred Street in Bath, and the young Lawrence established himself as a portraitist in pastels. The oval portraits, for which he was soon charging three guineas, were about 12 inches by 10 inches (30 by 25 centimetres), and usually portrayed a half-length. His sitters included the Duchess of Devonshire, Sarah Siddons, Sir Henry Harpur (of Calke Abbey, Derbyshire, who offered to send Lawrence to Italy – Lawrence senior refused to part with his son), Warren Hastings and Sir Elijah Impey.[7] Talented, charming and attractive (and surprisingly modest) Lawrence was popular with Bath residents and visitors: artists William Hoare and Mary Hartley gave him encouragement;[8] wealthy people allowed him to study their collections of paintings and Lawrence's drawing of a copy of Raphael's Transfiguration was awarded a silver-gilt palette and a prize of 5 guineas by the Society of Arts in London.[9]
"Always in love and always in debt"[10][edit]




Lawrence's first royal commission: Queen Charlotte


Sometime before his eighteenth birthday in 1787 Lawrence arrived in London, taking lodgings in Leicester Square, near to Joshua Reynolds' studio. He was introduced to Reynolds, who advised him to study nature, rather than the Old Masters. Lawrence set up a studio at 41 Jermyn Street and installed his parents in a house in Greek Street. He exhibited several works in the 1787 Royal Academy exhibition at Somerset House, and enrolled as a student at the Royal Academy but didn't stay long, abandoning the drawing of classical statues to concentrate on his portraiture. In the Royal Academy exhibition of 1788 Lawrence was represented by five portraits in pastels and one in oils, a medium he quickly mastered. Between 1787 and his death in 1830 he would miss only two of the annual exhibitions: once, 1809, in protest about the way his paintings had been displayed and once, in 1819, because he was abroad. In 1789 he exhibited 13 portraits, mostly in oil, including one of William Linley and one of Lady Cremorne, his first attempt at a full-length portrait.[11] The paintings received favourable comments in the press with one critic referring to him as "the Sir Joshua of futurity not far off" and, aged just twenty, Lawrence received his first royal commission, a summons arriving from Windsor Palace to paint the portraits of Queen Charlotte and Princess Amelia.[12] The queen found Lawrence presumptuous (although he made a good impression on the princesses and ladies-in-waiting) and she didn't like the finished portrait, which remained in Lawrence's studio until his death. When it was exhibited at the Royal Academy in 1790, however, it received critical acclaim.[13] Also shown that year was another of Lawrence's most famous portraits, that of the actress Elizabeth Farren, soon to be the Countess of Derby, "completely Elizabeth Farren: arch, spirited, elegant and engaging", according to one newspaper.[14]




Lawrence exhibited in 40 Royal Academy annual exhibitions


In 1791 Lawrence was elected an associate of the Royal Academy and the following year, on the death of Sir Joshua Reynolds, King George III appointed him "painter-in-ordinary to his majesty". His reputation was established, and he moved to a studio in Old Bond Street. In 1794 he became a full member of the Royal Academy.[15] Although commissions were pouring in, Lawrence was in financial difficulties. His debts would stay with him for the rest of life: he narrowly avoided bankruptcy and had to be bailed out by wealthy sitters and friends, and died insolvent. Biographers have never been able to discover the source of his debts; he was a prodigiously hard worker (once referring in a letter to his portrait painting as "mill-horse business")[16] and didn't appear to live extravagantly. Lawrence himself said: "I have never been extravagant nor profligate in the use of money. Neither gaming, horses, curricles, expensive entertainments, nor secret sources of ruin from vulgar licentiousness have swept it from me".[17] This has generally been accepted, with biographers blaming his financial problems on his generosity towards his family and others, his inability to keep accounts (in spite of advice from his friend the painter and diarist Joseph Farington), and his magnificent but costly collection of Old Master drawings.




Lawrence was in love with Sarah Siddons's daughter Sally. Painting by Thomas Lawrence, eighteenth century.


Another source of unhappiness in Lawrence's life was his romantic entanglement with two of Sarah Siddons' daughters. He fell in love first with Sally, then transferred his affections on to her sister Maria, then broke with Maria and turned to Sally again. Both the sisters had fragile health; Maria died in 1798, on her deathbed extracting a promise from her sister never to marry Lawrence. Sally kept her promise and refused to see Lawrence again, dying in 1803. But Lawrence continued on friendly terms with their mother and painted several portraits of her. He never married. In later years two women would provide him with companionship, friends Elizabeth Croft and Isabella Wolff who first met Lawrence when she sat for her portrait in 1803. Isabella was married to the Danish consul Jens Wolff, but she separated from him in 1810, and Sir Michael Levey suggests that people may have wondered if Lawrence was the father of her son Herman.[18]
Lawrence's departures from portraiture were very rare. In the early 1790s he completed two history pictures: Homer reciting his poems, a small picture of the poet in a pastoral setting; and Satan summoning his legions, a giant canvas to illustrate lines from John Milton's Paradise Lost.[19] The boxer John Jackson posed for the naked body of Satan; the face is that of Sarah Siddons' brother, John Philip Kemble.[20]




Portrait of Henry Dundas


Lawrence's parents died within a few months of each other in 1797 and he gave up his house in Picadilly, where he had moved from Old Bond Street, to set up his studio in the family home in Greek Street. By now, to keep up with the demand for replicas of his portraits, he was making use of studio assistants, most notable of whom would be William Etty and George Henry Harlow. The early years of the nineteenth century saw Lawrence's portrait practice continue to flourish: amongst his sitters were major political figures such as Henry Dundas, 1st Viscount Melville and William Lamb, 2nd Viscount Melbourne, whose wife Lady Caroline Lamb was also painted by Lawrence. The king commissioned portraits of his daughter-in-law Caroline, the estranged wife of the Prince of Wales, and his granddaughter Charlotte. Lawrence stayed at the Montague House, the residence of the princess in Blackheath, while he was painting the portraits and thus became implicated in the "delicate investigation" into Caroline's morals. He swore an affidavit that although he had on occasion been alone with the princess, the door had never been locked or bolted and he had "not the least objection for all the world to have heard or seen what took place".[21] Expertly defended by Spencer Perceval, he was exonerated.
"Pictorial chronicler of the Regency"[22][edit]




The Duke of Wellington in 1814


By the time the Prince of Wales was made regent in 1814, Lawrence was acknowledged as the foremost portrait painter in the country. Through one of his sitters, Lord Charles Stewart, he met the Prince Regent who was to become his most important patron. As well as portraits of himself, the prince commissioned portraits of allied leaders: the Duke of Wellington, Field-Marshal von Blücher and Count Platov sat for Lawrence at his new house at 65 Russell Square. The house was demolished in the early 20th century to make way for the Imperial Hotel. The private sitting-room of Sir Thomas Lawrence[23] shows Lawrence at 65 Russell Square, surrounded by casts of classical sculpture. The prince also had plans for Lawrence to travel abroad and paint foreign royalty and leaders, and as a preliminary he was given a knighthood on 22 April 1815. Napoleon's return from Elba put these plans on hold, although Lawrence did make a visit to Paris, where his friend Lord Charles Stewart was ambassador, and saw the art that Napoleon had looted from Italy, including Raphael's Transfiguration, the painting he had reproduced for his silver-gilt palette as a boy.[24]




Lawrence painted Pope Pius VII in Rome in 1819


In 1817 the prince commissioned Lawrence to paint a portrait of his daughter Princess Charlotte, who was pregnant with her first child. Charlotte died in childbirth; Lawrence completed the portrait and presented it to her husband Prince Leopold at Claremont on his birthday, as agreed. The princess's obstetrician, Sir Richard Croft, who later shot himself, was the half-brother of Lawrence's friend, Elizabeth Croft, and for her Lawrence drew a sketch of Croft in his coffin.[25]
Eventually, in September 1818, Lawrence was able to make his postponed trip to the continent to paint the allied leaders, first at Aachen and then at the conference of Vienna, for what would become the Waterloo Chamber series, housed in Windsor Castle. His sitters included Tsar Alexander, Emperor Francis I of Austria, the King of Prussia, Field-Marshal Prince Schwarzenberg, Archduke Charles of Austria and Henriette his wife, and a young Napoleon II, as well as various French and Prussian ministers. In May 1819, still under orders from the Prince Regent, he left Vienna for Rome to paint Pope Pius VII and Cardinal Consalvi.[26]
President of the Royal Academy[edit]




Anne, Viscountess Pollington, later Countess of Mexborough (d. 1870), with her son, John Charles, later 4th Earl of Mexborough London, Moretti Fine Art collection


Lawrence arrived back in London 30 March 1820 to find that the president of the Royal Academy, Benjamin West, had died. That very evening Lawrence was voted the new president, a position he would hold until his death 10 years later. George III had died in January; Lawrence was granted a place in the procession for the coronation of George IV. On 28 February 1822 he was elected as a Fellow of the Royal Society "for his eminence in art".[27] The royal commissions continued during the 1820s, including one for a portrait of the king's sister Sophia, and one of Sir Walter Scott (along with Jane Austen, one of Lawrence's favourite authors), as well as one to paint King Charles X of France for the Waterloo series, for which Lawrence made a trip to Paris, taking Herman Wolff with him.[28] Lawrence acquired another important patron in Robert Peel, who commissioned the painter to do portraits of his family as well a portrait of George Canning. Two of Lawrence's most famous portraits of children were painted during the 1820s: that of Emily and Laura Calmady and that of Master Charles William Lambton, painted for his father Lord Durham for 600 guineas and known as The Red Boy. The latter portrait attracted much praise when it was exhibited in Paris in 1827.[29] One of the artist's last commissions was of future prime-minister the Earl of Aberdeen. Fanny Kemble, a niece of Sarah Siddons, was one of his last sitters (for a drawing).
Lawrence died suddenly on 7 January 1830, just months after his friend Isabella Wolff. A few days previously he had experienced chest pains but had continued working and was eagerly anticipating a stay with his sister at Rugby, when he collapsed and died during a visit from his friends Elizabeth Croft and Archibald Keightley.[30] After a post-mortem examination, doctors concluded that the artist's death had been caused by ossification of the aorta and vessels of the heart. Lawrence's first biographer, D. E. Williams suggested that this in itself was not enough to cause death and it was his doctors' over-zealous bleeding and leeching that killed him.[31] Lawrence was buried on 21 January in the crypt of St Paul's Cathedral. Amongst the mourners was J. M. W. Turner who painted a sketch of the funeral from memory.[32] Turner's painting of Lawrence's funeral is in the Tate Gallery.




A bust of Thomas Lawrence by Edward Hodges Baily, 1830


Lawrence was famed for the length of time he took to finish some of his paintings (Isabella Wolff waited twelve years for her portrait to be completed) and, at his death, his studio contained a large number of unfinished works. Some were completed by his assistants and other artists, some were sold as they were. In his will Lawrence left instructions to offer, at a price much below their worth, his collection of Old Master drawings to first George IV, then the trustees of the British Museum, then Robert Peel and the Earl of Dudley. None of them accepted the offer and the collection was split up and auctioned; many of the drawings later found their way into the British Museum and the Ashmolean Museum.[33] After Lawrence's creditors had been paid, there was no money left, although a memorial exhibition at the British Institution raised £3,000 which was given to his nieces.[34]
Legacy[edit]




Elizabeth Farren's portrait went to the United States


Lawrence's friends asked the Scottish poet Thomas Campbell to write the artist's biography, but he passed the task on to D.E. Williams whose two rather inaccurate volumes were published in 1831.[35] It would be nearly 70 years later, in 1900, before another biography of Lawrence appeared, this time by Lord Ronald Gower. In 1913 Sir Walter Armstrong, who was not a great admirer of Lawrence, published a monograph. The 1950s saw the publication of two further works: Douglas Goldring's Regency portrait painter, and Kenneth Garlick's catalogue of Lawrence's paintings (a further edition was published in 1989). Sir Michael Levey, curator of the National Portrait Gallery's 1979–80 Lawrence exhibition, produced books on the artist in 1979 and 2005. Lawrence's entanglements with the Siddons family has been the subject of three books (by Oswald Knapp, André Maurois, and Naomi Royde-Smith) and a recent radio play.
Lawrence's reputation as an artist fell during the Victorian era. Critic and artist Roger Fry did something to restore it in the 1930s, when he described Lawrence as having a "consummate mastery over the means of artistic expression" with an "unerring hand and eye".[36] At one time Lawrence was more popular in the United States and France than he was in Britain, and some of his best known portraits, including those of Elizabeth Farren, Sarah Barrett Moulton (known to her family as Pinkie), and Charles Lambton (the "Red Boy") found their way to the United States during the early 20th century enthusiasm there for English portraits. Sir Michael Levey acknowledges that Lawrence is still dismissed by some art historians; his explanation is that "He was a highly original artist, quite unexpected on the English scene: self-taught, self-absorbed in perfecting his own personal style, and in effect self-destructing, since he left behind no significant followers or creative influence. Leaving aside Sargent, his sole successor has been not in painting, but in fashionable, virtuoso photography."[37]
The most extensive collections of Lawrence's work can be found in the Royal Collections[38] and the National Portrait Gallery in London.[39] The Tate Britain, the National Gallery and the Dulwich Picture Gallery house smaller collections of his work in London. There are a few examples of his work in the Holburne Museum of Art and the Victoria Art Gallery in Bath, and in Bristol City Museum and Art Gallery. In the United States, The Huntington Library houses Pinkie, and Lawrence's portraits of Elizabeth Farren, Lady Harriet Maria Conyngham, and the Calmady children are in the Metropolitan Museum of Art. In Europe, the Musée du Louvre has a few example's of Lawrence's work, and the Vatican Pinacoteca has a swagger portrait of George IV (presented by the king himself) as almost its only British work.
In 2010 the National Portrait Gallery held a retrospective exhibition of Lawrence's work. The director of the National Portrait Gallery, Sandy Nairne, was quoted in the Guardian describing Lawrence as: "a huge figure. But a huge figure who we believe deserves a great deal more attention. He is one of the great painters of the last 250 years and one of the great stars of portraiture on a European stage."[40]
Gallery[edit]







Alexander MacKenzie, (c.1800-1801), National Gallery of Canada









Portrait of the Honorable Mrs. Seymour Bathurst, 1828, Dallas Museum of Art









Lord Seaforth, (c.1805), Figge Art Museum, Davenport, USA









Portrait of Marguerite, Countess of Blessington, 1822, Wallace Collection, London









King George IV's coronation









Francis Humberstone MacKenzie of the 78th Highlanders









Maria, wife of Sir William Oglander, 6th Baronet









Arthur Wellesley, 1st Duke of Wellington









The Children of Ayscoghe Boucherett









Queen Maria II of Portugal









Jacome Ratton, Museu Nacional de Arte Antiga









Miss Marthe Carr (Museo del Prado)









George Hibbert









Lady Maria Conyngham, 1824–25




See also[edit]

English school of painting

Notes[edit]


^ The Black Bear is still a hotel
^ Goldring 1951: 28
^ Goldring 1951: 35
^ Goldring 1951: 29
^ Annual Review 1830
^ Goldring 1951: 40
^ Levey 2005: 49–59
^ Levey 2005: 43
^ Levey 2005: 56
^ L.J. Jennings 1885 The Croker papers, vol 2: 297
^ Levey 2005: 77–79
^ Levey 2005: 76–77
^ Levey 2005: 85–90
^ Levey 2005: 92
^ Lawrence is shown second from left seated (number 6) in Henry Singleton's The Royal Academicians in General Assembly, 1795
^ Levey 2005: 137
^ Lawrence, Sir Thomas Dictionary of national biography, vol. 32, 1892: 278–285
^ Levey 2005: 194, 263
^ Royal Academy of the Arts Collections artist of the month: Sir Thomas Lawrence features Satan summoning his legions
^ Goldring 1951: 110
^ Goldring 1951: 213–219
^ Levey 2005: 171
^ "National Portrait Gallery - Large Image - NPG D37049; The Private Sitting Room of Sir Thomas Lawrence". npg.org.uk. 
^ Levey 2005: 198
^ Levey 2005: 201–3
^ Levey 2005: 207–238
^ "Library and Archive Catalog: Lawrence, Sir Thomas (1769–1830)". London: The Royal Society. Retrieved 6 July 2010. 
^ Levey 2005: 263
^ Levey 2005: 249–258
^ Levey 2005: 296–99
^ Goldring 1951: 330
^ "'Funeral of Sir Thomas Lawrence: A Sketch from Memory', Joseph Mallord William Turner - Tate". Tate. 
^ Goldring 1951: 335–342
^ Levey 2005: 306
^ Levey 2005: 302–3
^ Roger Fry (Reflections on British Painting, 1934) quoted in Levey 2005: 309
^ Levey 2005: 312–13
^ "The Collection". royalcollection.org.uk. 
^ "National Portrait Gallery - Person - Sir Thomas Lawrence". npg.org.uk. 
^ Brown, Mark (4 August 2010). "National Portrait Gallery shines light on forgotten artist Thomas Lawrence". The Guardian. Retrieved 24 April 2014. 


References[edit]

D Goldring 1951 Regency portrait painter: the life of Sir Thomas Lawrence, P.R.A. London: Macdonald
M Levey 2005 Sir Thomas Lawrence. New Haven and London: Yale University Press

External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Thomas Lawrence.



Thomas Lawrence: Regency Power and Brilliance exhibition at the National Portrait Gallery
Thomas Lawrence exhibition catalogs
"Gainsborough's forgotten rival is recognised at last" Jerome Taylor, The Independent, 5 August 2010
"Thomas Lawrence: the new romantic – review" Richard Holmes reviews the National Portrait Gallery exhibition, The Guardian, 16 October 2010
337 Painting(s) by or after Thomas Lawrence at the Art UK site



Court offices


Preceded by
Sir Joshua Reynolds
Principal Painter in Ordinary to the King
1792–1830
Succeeded by
David Wilkie


Cultural offices


Preceded by
Benjamin West
President of the Royal Academy
1820–1830
Succeeded by
Martin Archer Shee





Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 59122598
LCCN: n81008170
ISNI: 0000 0001 1473 2825
GND: 118778994
SELIBR: 268581
SUDOC: 030083478
BNF: cb121571118 (data)
ULAN: 500022619
NLA: 35281740
NKC: xx0132678
BNE: XX995063
RKD: 48440










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Thomas_Lawrence&oldid=790099206"					
Categories: 1769 births1830 deaths18th-century English paintersEnglish male painters19th-century English paintersArtists from BristolEnglish romantic paintersEnglish portrait paintersFellows of the Royal SocietyMembers of The ClubPrincipal Painters in OrdinaryRoyal AcademiciansKnights BachelorHonorary titles of the United KingdomFellows of the Royal Society (Statute 12)Hidden categories: EngvarB from October 2013Use dmy dates from October 2013Articles with hCardsPages using infobox artist with unknown parametersWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiersWikipedia articles with SELIBR identifiersWikipedia articles with BNF identifiersWikipedia articles with ULAN identifiersWikipedia articles with NLA identifiersWikipedia articles with RKDartists identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


العربيةAragonésCatalàČeštinaDanskDeutschΕλληνικάEspañolEsperantoفارسیFrançaisIdoItalianoעבריתLietuviųMagyarNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålNorsk nynorskPolskiPortuguêsРусскийSimple EnglishSuomiSvenskaไทยУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 11 July 2017, at 16:16.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Thomas Lawrence - Wikipedia






















 






Thomas Lawrence

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For other people named Thomas Lawrence, see Thomas Lawrence (disambiguation).


Sir Thomas Lawrence



Thomas Lawrence, Self-portrait, 1788



Born
(1769-04-13)13 April 1769
Bristol, England


Died
7 January 1830(1830-01-07) (aged 60)
London, England


Nationality
English


Known for
Painting


Movement
Romanticism


Sir Thomas Lawrence PRA FRS (13 April 1769 – 7 January 1830) was a leading English portrait painter and the fourth president of the Royal Academy.
Lawrence was a child prodigy. He was born in Bristol and began drawing in Devizes, where his father was an innkeeper. At the age of ten, having moved to Bath, he was supporting his family with his pastel portraits. At eighteen he went to London and soon established his reputation as a portrait painter in oils, receiving his first royal commission, a portrait of Queen Charlotte, in 1790. He stayed at the top of his profession until his death, aged 60, in 1830.
Self-taught, he was a brilliant draughtsman and known for his gift of capturing a likeness, as well as his virtuoso handling of paint. He became an associate of the Royal Academy in 1791, a full member in 1794, and president in 1820. In 1810 he acquired the generous patronage of the Prince Regent, was sent abroad to paint portraits of allied leaders for the Waterloo chamber at Windsor Castle, and is particularly remembered as the Romantic portraitist of the Regency. Lawrence's love affairs were not happy (his tortuous relationships with Sally and Maria Siddons became the subject of several books) and, in spite of his success, he spent most of life deep in debt. He never married. At his death, Lawrence was the most fashionable portrait painter in Europe. His reputation waned during Victorian times, but has since been partially restored.



Contents


1 Biography

1.1 Childhood and early career
1.2 "Always in love and always in debt"[10]
1.3 "Pictorial chronicler of the Regency"[22]
1.4 President of the Royal Academy


2 Legacy
3 Gallery
4 See also
5 Notes
6 References
7 External links



Biography[edit]
Childhood and early career[edit]
Thomas Lawrence was born at 6 Redcross Street, Bristol, the youngest surviving child of Thomas Lawrence, a supervisor of excise, and Lucy Read, the daughter of a clergyman. The couple had 16 children but only five survived infancy: Lawrence's brother Andrew became a clergyman; William had a career in the army; sisters Lucy and Anne married a solicitor and a clergyman (Lawrence's nephews included Andrew Bloxam). Soon after Thomas was born his father decided to become an innkeeper and took over the White Lion Inn and next-door American Coffee House in Broad Street, Bristol. But the venture did not prosper and in 1773 Lawrence senior removed his family from Bristol and took over the tenancy of the Black Bear Inn in Devizes,[1] a favourite stopping place for the London gentry who were making their annual trip to take the waters at Bath.[2]
It was during the family's six-year stay at the Black Bear Inn that Lawrence senior began to make use of his son's precocious talents for drawing and reciting poetry. Visitors would be greeted with the words "Gentlemen, here's my son – will you have him recite from the poets, or take your portraits?" Among those who listened to a recitation from Tom, or Tommy as he was called, was the actor David Garrick.[3] Lawrence's formal schooling was limited to two years at The Fort, a school in Bristol, when he was aged six to eight, and a little tuition in French and Latin from a dissenting minister.[4] He also became accomplished in dancing, fencing, boxing and billiards.[5] By the age of ten his fame had spread sufficiently for him to receive a mention in Daines Barrington's Miscellanies as "without the most distant instruction from anyone, capable of copying historical pictures in a masterly style".[6] But once again Lawrence senior failed as a landlord and, in 1779, he was declared bankrupt and the family moved to Bath. From now on, Lawrence was to support his parents with the money he earned from his portraits.




An early pastel portrait


The family settled at 2 Alfred Street in Bath, and the young Lawrence established himself as a portraitist in pastels. The oval portraits, for which he was soon charging three guineas, were about 12 inches by 10 inches (30 by 25 centimetres), and usually portrayed a half-length. His sitters included the Duchess of Devonshire, Sarah Siddons, Sir Henry Harpur (of Calke Abbey, Derbyshire, who offered to send Lawrence to Italy – Lawrence senior refused to part with his son), Warren Hastings and Sir Elijah Impey.[7] Talented, charming and attractive (and surprisingly modest) Lawrence was popular with Bath residents and visitors: artists William Hoare and Mary Hartley gave him encouragement;[8] wealthy people allowed him to study their collections of paintings and Lawrence's drawing of a copy of Raphael's Transfiguration was awarded a silver-gilt palette and a prize of 5 guineas by the Society of Arts in London.[9]
"Always in love and always in debt"[10][edit]




Lawrence's first royal commission: Queen Charlotte


Sometime before his eighteenth birthday in 1787 Lawrence arrived in London, taking lodgings in Leicester Square, near to Joshua Reynolds' studio. He was introduced to Reynolds, who advised him to study nature, rather than the Old Masters. Lawrence set up a studio at 41 Jermyn Street and installed his parents in a house in Greek Street. He exhibited several works in the 1787 Royal Academy exhibition at Somerset House, and enrolled as a student at the Royal Academy but didn't stay long, abandoning the drawing of classical statues to concentrate on his portraiture. In the Royal Academy exhibition of 1788 Lawrence was represented by five portraits in pastels and one in oils, a medium he quickly mastered. Between 1787 and his death in 1830 he would miss only two of the annual exhibitions: once, 1809, in protest about the way his paintings had been displayed and once, in 1819, because he was abroad. In 1789 he exhibited 13 portraits, mostly in oil, including one of William Linley and one of Lady Cremorne, his first attempt at a full-length portrait.[11] The paintings received favourable comments in the press with one critic referring to him as "the Sir Joshua of futurity not far off" and, aged just twenty, Lawrence received his first royal commission, a summons arriving from Windsor Palace to paint the portraits of Queen Charlotte and Princess Amelia.[12] The queen found Lawrence presumptuous (although he made a good impression on the princesses and ladies-in-waiting) and she didn't like the finished portrait, which remained in Lawrence's studio until his death. When it was exhibited at the Royal Academy in 1790, however, it received critical acclaim.[13] Also shown that year was another of Lawrence's most famous portraits, that of the actress Elizabeth Farren, soon to be the Countess of Derby, "completely Elizabeth Farren: arch, spirited, elegant and engaging", according to one newspaper.[14]




Lawrence exhibited in 40 Royal Academy annual exhibitions


In 1791 Lawrence was elected an associate of the Royal Academy and the following year, on the death of Sir Joshua Reynolds, King George III appointed him "painter-in-ordinary to his majesty". His reputation was established, and he moved to a studio in Old Bond Street. In 1794 he became a full member of the Royal Academy.[15] Although commissions were pouring in, Lawrence was in financial difficulties. His debts would stay with him for the rest of life: he narrowly avoided bankruptcy and had to be bailed out by wealthy sitters and friends, and died insolvent. Biographers have never been able to discover the source of his debts; he was a prodigiously hard worker (once referring in a letter to his portrait painting as "mill-horse business")[16] and didn't appear to live extravagantly. Lawrence himself said: "I have never been extravagant nor profligate in the use of money. Neither gaming, horses, curricles, expensive entertainments, nor secret sources of ruin from vulgar licentiousness have swept it from me".[17] This has generally been accepted, with biographers blaming his financial problems on his generosity towards his family and others, his inability to keep accounts (in spite of advice from his friend the painter and diarist Joseph Farington), and his magnificent but costly collection of Old Master drawings.




Lawrence was in love with Sarah Siddons's daughter Sally. Painting by Thomas Lawrence, eighteenth century.


Another source of unhappiness in Lawrence's life was his romantic entanglement with two of Sarah Siddons' daughters. He fell in love first with Sally, then transferred his affections on to her sister Maria, then broke with Maria and turned to Sally again. Both the sisters had fragile health; Maria died in 1798, on her deathbed extracting a promise from her sister never to marry Lawrence. Sally kept her promise and refused to see Lawrence again, dying in 1803. But Lawrence continued on friendly terms with their mother and painted several portraits of her. He never married. In later years two women would provide him with companionship, friends Elizabeth Croft and Isabella Wolff who first met Lawrence when she sat for her portrait in 1803. Isabella was married to the Danish consul Jens Wolff, but she separated from him in 1810, and Sir Michael Levey suggests that people may have wondered if Lawrence was the father of her son Herman.[18]
Lawrence's departures from portraiture were very rare. In the early 1790s he completed two history pictures: Homer reciting his poems, a small picture of the poet in a pastoral setting; and Satan summoning his legions, a giant canvas to illustrate lines from John Milton's Paradise Lost.[19] The boxer John Jackson posed for the naked body of Satan; the face is that of Sarah Siddons' brother, John Philip Kemble.[20]




Portrait of Henry Dundas


Lawrence's parents died within a few months of each other in 1797 and he gave up his house in Picadilly, where he had moved from Old Bond Street, to set up his studio in the family home in Greek Street. By now, to keep up with the demand for replicas of his portraits, he was making use of studio assistants, most notable of whom would be William Etty and George Henry Harlow. The early years of the nineteenth century saw Lawrence's portrait practice continue to flourish: amongst his sitters were major political figures such as Henry Dundas, 1st Viscount Melville and William Lamb, 2nd Viscount Melbourne, whose wife Lady Caroline Lamb was also painted by Lawrence. The king commissioned portraits of his daughter-in-law Caroline, the estranged wife of the Prince of Wales, and his granddaughter Charlotte. Lawrence stayed at the Montague House, the residence of the princess in Blackheath, while he was painting the portraits and thus became implicated in the "delicate investigation" into Caroline's morals. He swore an affidavit that although he had on occasion been alone with the princess, the door had never been locked or bolted and he had "not the least objection for all the world to have heard or seen what took place".[21] Expertly defended by Spencer Perceval, he was exonerated.
"Pictorial chronicler of the Regency"[22][edit]




The Duke of Wellington in 1814


By the time the Prince of Wales was made regent in 1814, Lawrence was acknowledged as the foremost portrait painter in the country. Through one of his sitters, Lord Charles Stewart, he met the Prince Regent who was to become his most important patron. As well as portraits of himself, the prince commissioned portraits of allied leaders: the Duke of Wellington, Field-Marshal von Blücher and Count Platov sat for Lawrence at his new house at 65 Russell Square. The house was demolished in the early 20th century to make way for the Imperial Hotel. The private sitting-room of Sir Thomas Lawrence[23] shows Lawrence at 65 Russell Square, surrounded by casts of classical sculpture. The prince also had plans for Lawrence to travel abroad and paint foreign royalty and leaders, and as a preliminary he was given a knighthood on 22 April 1815. Napoleon's return from Elba put these plans on hold, although Lawrence did make a visit to Paris, where his friend Lord Charles Stewart was ambassador, and saw the art that Napoleon had looted from Italy, including Raphael's Transfiguration, the painting he had reproduced for his silver-gilt palette as a boy.[24]




Lawrence painted Pope Pius VII in Rome in 1819


In 1817 the prince commissioned Lawrence to paint a portrait of his daughter Princess Charlotte, who was pregnant with her first child. Charlotte died in childbirth; Lawrence completed the portrait and presented it to her husband Prince Leopold at Claremont on his birthday, as agreed. The princess's obstetrician, Sir Richard Croft, who later shot himself, was the half-brother of Lawrence's friend, Elizabeth Croft, and for her Lawrence drew a sketch of Croft in his coffin.[25]
Eventually, in September 1818, Lawrence was able to make his postponed trip to the continent to paint the allied leaders, first at Aachen and then at the conference of Vienna, for what would become the Waterloo Chamber series, housed in Windsor Castle. His sitters included Tsar Alexander, Emperor Francis I of Austria, the King of Prussia, Field-Marshal Prince Schwarzenberg, Archduke Charles of Austria and Henriette his wife, and a young Napoleon II, as well as various French and Prussian ministers. In May 1819, still under orders from the Prince Regent, he left Vienna for Rome to paint Pope Pius VII and Cardinal Consalvi.[26]
President of the Royal Academy[edit]




Anne, Viscountess Pollington, later Countess of Mexborough (d. 1870), with her son, John Charles, later 4th Earl of Mexborough London, Moretti Fine Art collection


Lawrence arrived back in London 30 March 1820 to find that the president of the Royal Academy, Benjamin West, had died. That very evening Lawrence was voted the new president, a position he would hold until his death 10 years later. George III had died in January; Lawrence was granted a place in the procession for the coronation of George IV. On 28 February 1822 he was elected as a Fellow of the Royal Society "for his eminence in art".[27] The royal commissions continued during the 1820s, including one for a portrait of the king's sister Sophia, and one of Sir Walter Scott (along with Jane Austen, one of Lawrence's favourite authors), as well as one to paint King Charles X of France for the Waterloo series, for which Lawrence made a trip to Paris, taking Herman Wolff with him.[28] Lawrence acquired another important patron in Robert Peel, who commissioned the painter to do portraits of his family as well a portrait of George Canning. Two of Lawrence's most famous portraits of children were painted during the 1820s: that of Emily and Laura Calmady and that of Master Charles William Lambton, painted for his father Lord Durham for 600 guineas and known as The Red Boy. The latter portrait attracted much praise when it was exhibited in Paris in 1827.[29] One of the artist's last commissions was of future prime-minister the Earl of Aberdeen. Fanny Kemble, a niece of Sarah Siddons, was one of his last sitters (for a drawing).
Lawrence died suddenly on 7 January 1830, just months after his friend Isabella Wolff. A few days previously he had experienced chest pains but had continued working and was eagerly anticipating a stay with his sister at Rugby, when he collapsed and died during a visit from his friends Elizabeth Croft and Archibald Keightley.[30] After a post-mortem examination, doctors concluded that the artist's death had been caused by ossification of the aorta and vessels of the heart. Lawrence's first biographer, D. E. Williams suggested that this in itself was not enough to cause death and it was his doctors' over-zealous bleeding and leeching that killed him.[31] Lawrence was buried on 21 January in the crypt of St Paul's Cathedral. Amongst the mourners was J. M. W. Turner who painted a sketch of the funeral from memory.[32] Turner's painting of Lawrence's funeral is in the Tate Gallery.




A bust of Thomas Lawrence by Edward Hodges Baily, 1830


Lawrence was famed for the length of time he took to finish some of his paintings (Isabella Wolff waited twelve years for her portrait to be completed) and, at his death, his studio contained a large number of unfinished works. Some were completed by his assistants and other artists, some were sold as they were. In his will Lawrence left instructions to offer, at a price much below their worth, his collection of Old Master drawings to first George IV, then the trustees of the British Museum, then Robert Peel and the Earl of Dudley. None of them accepted the offer and the collection was split up and auctioned; many of the drawings later found their way into the British Museum and the Ashmolean Museum.[33] After Lawrence's creditors had been paid, there was no money left, although a memorial exhibition at the British Institution raised £3,000 which was given to his nieces.[34]
Legacy[edit]




Elizabeth Farren's portrait went to the United States


Lawrence's friends asked the Scottish poet Thomas Campbell to write the artist's biography, but he passed the task on to D.E. Williams whose two rather inaccurate volumes were published in 1831.[35] It would be nearly 70 years later, in 1900, before another biography of Lawrence appeared, this time by Lord Ronald Gower. In 1913 Sir Walter Armstrong, who was not a great admirer of Lawrence, published a monograph. The 1950s saw the publication of two further works: Douglas Goldring's Regency portrait painter, and Kenneth Garlick's catalogue of Lawrence's paintings (a further edition was published in 1989). Sir Michael Levey, curator of the National Portrait Gallery's 1979–80 Lawrence exhibition, produced books on the artist in 1979 and 2005. Lawrence's entanglements with the Siddons family has been the subject of three books (by Oswald Knapp, André Maurois, and Naomi Royde-Smith) and a recent radio play.
Lawrence's reputation as an artist fell during the Victorian era. Critic and artist Roger Fry did something to restore it in the 1930s, when he described Lawrence as having a "consummate mastery over the means of artistic expression" with an "unerring hand and eye".[36] At one time Lawrence was more popular in the United States and France than he was in Britain, and some of his best known portraits, including those of Elizabeth Farren, Sarah Barrett Moulton (known to her family as Pinkie), and Charles Lambton (the "Red Boy") found their way to the United States during the early 20th century enthusiasm there for English portraits. Sir Michael Levey acknowledges that Lawrence is still dismissed by some art historians; his explanation is that "He was a highly original artist, quite unexpected on the English scene: self-taught, self-absorbed in perfecting his own personal style, and in effect self-destructing, since he left behind no significant followers or creative influence. Leaving aside Sargent, his sole successor has been not in painting, but in fashionable, virtuoso photography."[37]
The most extensive collections of Lawrence's work can be found in the Royal Collections[38] and the National Portrait Gallery in London.[39] The Tate Britain, the National Gallery and the Dulwich Picture Gallery house smaller collections of his work in London. There are a few examples of his work in the Holburne Museum of Art and the Victoria Art Gallery in Bath, and in Bristol City Museum and Art Gallery. In the United States, The Huntington Library houses Pinkie, and Lawrence's portraits of Elizabeth Farren, Lady Harriet Maria Conyngham, and the Calmady children are in the Metropolitan Museum of Art. In Europe, the Musée du Louvre has a few example's of Lawrence's work, and the Vatican Pinacoteca has a swagger portrait of George IV (presented by the king himself) as almost its only British work.
In 2010 the National Portrait Gallery held a retrospective exhibition of Lawrence's work. The director of the National Portrait Gallery, Sandy Nairne, was quoted in the Guardian describing Lawrence as: "a huge figure. But a huge figure who we believe deserves a great deal more attention. He is one of the great painters of the last 250 years and one of the great stars of portraiture on a European stage."[40]
Gallery[edit]







Alexander MacKenzie, (c.1800-1801), National Gallery of Canada









Portrait of the Honorable Mrs. Seymour Bathurst, 1828, Dallas Museum of Art









Lord Seaforth, (c.1805), Figge Art Museum, Davenport, USA









Portrait of Marguerite, Countess of Blessington, 1822, Wallace Collection, London









King George IV's coronation









Francis Humberstone MacKenzie of the 78th Highlanders









Maria, wife of Sir William Oglander, 6th Baronet









Arthur Wellesley, 1st Duke of Wellington









The Children of Ayscoghe Boucherett









Queen Maria II of Portugal









Jacome Ratton, Museu Nacional de Arte Antiga









Miss Marthe Carr (Museo del Prado)









George Hibbert









Lady Maria Conyngham, 1824–25




See also[edit]

English school of painting

Notes[edit]


^ The Black Bear is still a hotel
^ Goldring 1951: 28
^ Goldring 1951: 35
^ Goldring 1951: 29
^ Annual Review 1830
^ Goldring 1951: 40
^ Levey 2005: 49–59
^ Levey 2005: 43
^ Levey 2005: 56
^ L.J. Jennings 1885 The Croker papers, vol 2: 297
^ Levey 2005: 77–79
^ Levey 2005: 76–77
^ Levey 2005: 85–90
^ Levey 2005: 92
^ Lawrence is shown second from left seated (number 6) in Henry Singleton's The Royal Academicians in General Assembly, 1795
^ Levey 2005: 137
^ Lawrence, Sir Thomas Dictionary of national biography, vol. 32, 1892: 278–285
^ Levey 2005: 194, 263
^ Royal Academy of the Arts Collections artist of the month: Sir Thomas Lawrence features Satan summoning his legions
^ Goldring 1951: 110
^ Goldring 1951: 213–219
^ Levey 2005: 171
^ "National Portrait Gallery - Large Image - NPG D37049; The Private Sitting Room of Sir Thomas Lawrence". npg.org.uk. 
^ Levey 2005: 198
^ Levey 2005: 201–3
^ Levey 2005: 207–238
^ "Library and Archive Catalog: Lawrence, Sir Thomas (1769–1830)". London: The Royal Society. Retrieved 6 July 2010. 
^ Levey 2005: 263
^ Levey 2005: 249–258
^ Levey 2005: 296–99
^ Goldring 1951: 330
^ "'Funeral of Sir Thomas Lawrence: A Sketch from Memory', Joseph Mallord William Turner - Tate". Tate. 
^ Goldring 1951: 335–342
^ Levey 2005: 306
^ Levey 2005: 302–3
^ Roger Fry (Reflections on British Painting, 1934) quoted in Levey 2005: 309
^ Levey 2005: 312–13
^ "The Collection". royalcollection.org.uk. 
^ "National Portrait Gallery - Person - Sir Thomas Lawrence". npg.org.uk. 
^ Brown, Mark (4 August 2010). "National Portrait Gallery shines light on forgotten artist Thomas Lawrence". The Guardian. Retrieved 24 April 2014. 


References[edit]

D Goldring 1951 Regency portrait painter: the life of Sir Thomas Lawrence, P.R.A. London: Macdonald
M Levey 2005 Sir Thomas Lawrence. New Haven and London: Yale University Press

External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Thomas Lawrence.



Thomas Lawrence: Regency Power and Brilliance exhibition at the National Portrait Gallery
Thomas Lawrence exhibition catalogs
"Gainsborough's forgotten rival is recognised at last" Jerome Taylor, The Independent, 5 August 2010
"Thomas Lawrence: the new romantic – review" Richard Holmes reviews the National Portrait Gallery exhibition, The Guardian, 16 October 2010
337 Painting(s) by or after Thomas Lawrence at the Art UK site



Court offices


Preceded by
Sir Joshua Reynolds
Principal Painter in Ordinary to the King
1792–1830
Succeeded by
David Wilkie


Cultural offices


Preceded by
Benjamin West
President of the Royal Academy
1820–1830
Succeeded by
Martin Archer Shee





Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 59122598
LCCN: n81008170
ISNI: 0000 0001 1473 2825
GND: 118778994
SELIBR: 268581
SUDOC: 030083478
BNF: cb121571118 (data)
ULAN: 500022619
NLA: 35281740
NKC: xx0132678
BNE: XX995063
RKD: 48440










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Thomas_Lawrence&oldid=790099206"					
Categories: 1769 births1830 deaths18th-century English paintersEnglish male painters19th-century English paintersArtists from BristolEnglish romantic paintersEnglish portrait paintersFellows of the Royal SocietyMembers of The ClubPrincipal Painters in OrdinaryRoyal AcademiciansKnights BachelorHonorary titles of the United KingdomFellows of the Royal Society (Statute 12)Hidden categories: EngvarB from October 2013Use dmy dates from October 2013Articles with hCardsPages using infobox artist with unknown parametersWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiersWikipedia articles with SELIBR identifiersWikipedia articles with BNF identifiersWikipedia articles with ULAN identifiersWikipedia articles with NLA identifiersWikipedia articles with RKDartists identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


العربيةAragonésCatalàČeštinaDanskDeutschΕλληνικάEspañolEsperantoفارسیFrançaisIdoItalianoעבריתLietuviųMagyarNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålNorsk nynorskPolskiPortuguêsРусскийSimple EnglishSuomiSvenskaไทยУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 11 July 2017, at 16:16.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Thomas Lawrence - Wikipedia






















 






Thomas Lawrence

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For other people named Thomas Lawrence, see Thomas Lawrence (disambiguation).


Sir Thomas Lawrence



Thomas Lawrence, Self-portrait, 1788



Born
(1769-04-13)13 April 1769
Bristol, England


Died
7 January 1830(1830-01-07) (aged 60)
London, England


Nationality
English


Known for
Painting


Movement
Romanticism


Sir Thomas Lawrence PRA FRS (13 April 1769 – 7 January 1830) was a leading English portrait painter and the fourth president of the Royal Academy.
Lawrence was a child prodigy. He was born in Bristol and began drawing in Devizes, where his father was an innkeeper. At the age of ten, having moved to Bath, he was supporting his family with his pastel portraits. At eighteen he went to London and soon established his reputation as a portrait painter in oils, receiving his first royal commission, a portrait of Queen Charlotte, in 1790. He stayed at the top of his profession until his death, aged 60, in 1830.
Self-taught, he was a brilliant draughtsman and known for his gift of capturing a likeness, as well as his virtuoso handling of paint. He became an associate of the Royal Academy in 1791, a full member in 1794, and president in 1820. In 1810 he acquired the generous patronage of the Prince Regent, was sent abroad to paint portraits of allied leaders for the Waterloo chamber at Windsor Castle, and is particularly remembered as the Romantic portraitist of the Regency. Lawrence's love affairs were not happy (his tortuous relationships with Sally and Maria Siddons became the subject of several books) and, in spite of his success, he spent most of life deep in debt. He never married. At his death, Lawrence was the most fashionable portrait painter in Europe. His reputation waned during Victorian times, but has since been partially restored.



Contents


1 Biography

1.1 Childhood and early career
1.2 "Always in love and always in debt"[10]
1.3 "Pictorial chronicler of the Regency"[22]
1.4 President of the Royal Academy


2 Legacy
3 Gallery
4 See also
5 Notes
6 References
7 External links



Biography[edit]
Childhood and early career[edit]
Thomas Lawrence was born at 6 Redcross Street, Bristol, the youngest surviving child of Thomas Lawrence, a supervisor of excise, and Lucy Read, the daughter of a clergyman. The couple had 16 children but only five survived infancy: Lawrence's brother Andrew became a clergyman; William had a career in the army; sisters Lucy and Anne married a solicitor and a clergyman (Lawrence's nephews included Andrew Bloxam). Soon after Thomas was born his father decided to become an innkeeper and took over the White Lion Inn and next-door American Coffee House in Broad Street, Bristol. But the venture did not prosper and in 1773 Lawrence senior removed his family from Bristol and took over the tenancy of the Black Bear Inn in Devizes,[1] a favourite stopping place for the London gentry who were making their annual trip to take the waters at Bath.[2]
It was during the family's six-year stay at the Black Bear Inn that Lawrence senior began to make use of his son's precocious talents for drawing and reciting poetry. Visitors would be greeted with the words "Gentlemen, here's my son – will you have him recite from the poets, or take your portraits?" Among those who listened to a recitation from Tom, or Tommy as he was called, was the actor David Garrick.[3] Lawrence's formal schooling was limited to two years at The Fort, a school in Bristol, when he was aged six to eight, and a little tuition in French and Latin from a dissenting minister.[4] He also became accomplished in dancing, fencing, boxing and billiards.[5] By the age of ten his fame had spread sufficiently for him to receive a mention in Daines Barrington's Miscellanies as "without the most distant instruction from anyone, capable of copying historical pictures in a masterly style".[6] But once again Lawrence senior failed as a landlord and, in 1779, he was declared bankrupt and the family moved to Bath. From now on, Lawrence was to support his parents with the money he earned from his portraits.




An early pastel portrait


The family settled at 2 Alfred Street in Bath, and the young Lawrence established himself as a portraitist in pastels. The oval portraits, for which he was soon charging three guineas, were about 12 inches by 10 inches (30 by 25 centimetres), and usually portrayed a half-length. His sitters included the Duchess of Devonshire, Sarah Siddons, Sir Henry Harpur (of Calke Abbey, Derbyshire, who offered to send Lawrence to Italy – Lawrence senior refused to part with his son), Warren Hastings and Sir Elijah Impey.[7] Talented, charming and attractive (and surprisingly modest) Lawrence was popular with Bath residents and visitors: artists William Hoare and Mary Hartley gave him encouragement;[8] wealthy people allowed him to study their collections of paintings and Lawrence's drawing of a copy of Raphael's Transfiguration was awarded a silver-gilt palette and a prize of 5 guineas by the Society of Arts in London.[9]
"Always in love and always in debt"[10][edit]




Lawrence's first royal commission: Queen Charlotte


Sometime before his eighteenth birthday in 1787 Lawrence arrived in London, taking lodgings in Leicester Square, near to Joshua Reynolds' studio. He was introduced to Reynolds, who advised him to study nature, rather than the Old Masters. Lawrence set up a studio at 41 Jermyn Street and installed his parents in a house in Greek Street. He exhibited several works in the 1787 Royal Academy exhibition at Somerset House, and enrolled as a student at the Royal Academy but didn't stay long, abandoning the drawing of classical statues to concentrate on his portraiture. In the Royal Academy exhibition of 1788 Lawrence was represented by five portraits in pastels and one in oils, a medium he quickly mastered. Between 1787 and his death in 1830 he would miss only two of the annual exhibitions: once, 1809, in protest about the way his paintings had been displayed and once, in 1819, because he was abroad. In 1789 he exhibited 13 portraits, mostly in oil, including one of William Linley and one of Lady Cremorne, his first attempt at a full-length portrait.[11] The paintings received favourable comments in the press with one critic referring to him as "the Sir Joshua of futurity not far off" and, aged just twenty, Lawrence received his first royal commission, a summons arriving from Windsor Palace to paint the portraits of Queen Charlotte and Princess Amelia.[12] The queen found Lawrence presumptuous (although he made a good impression on the princesses and ladies-in-waiting) and she didn't like the finished portrait, which remained in Lawrence's studio until his death. When it was exhibited at the Royal Academy in 1790, however, it received critical acclaim.[13] Also shown that year was another of Lawrence's most famous portraits, that of the actress Elizabeth Farren, soon to be the Countess of Derby, "completely Elizabeth Farren: arch, spirited, elegant and engaging", according to one newspaper.[14]




Lawrence exhibited in 40 Royal Academy annual exhibitions


In 1791 Lawrence was elected an associate of the Royal Academy and the following year, on the death of Sir Joshua Reynolds, King George III appointed him "painter-in-ordinary to his majesty". His reputation was established, and he moved to a studio in Old Bond Street. In 1794 he became a full member of the Royal Academy.[15] Although commissions were pouring in, Lawrence was in financial difficulties. His debts would stay with him for the rest of life: he narrowly avoided bankruptcy and had to be bailed out by wealthy sitters and friends, and died insolvent. Biographers have never been able to discover the source of his debts; he was a prodigiously hard worker (once referring in a letter to his portrait painting as "mill-horse business")[16] and didn't appear to live extravagantly. Lawrence himself said: "I have never been extravagant nor profligate in the use of money. Neither gaming, horses, curricles, expensive entertainments, nor secret sources of ruin from vulgar licentiousness have swept it from me".[17] This has generally been accepted, with biographers blaming his financial problems on his generosity towards his family and others, his inability to keep accounts (in spite of advice from his friend the painter and diarist Joseph Farington), and his magnificent but costly collection of Old Master drawings.




Lawrence was in love with Sarah Siddons's daughter Sally. Painting by Thomas Lawrence, eighteenth century.


Another source of unhappiness in Lawrence's life was his romantic entanglement with two of Sarah Siddons' daughters. He fell in love first with Sally, then transferred his affections on to her sister Maria, then broke with Maria and turned to Sally again. Both the sisters had fragile health; Maria died in 1798, on her deathbed extracting a promise from her sister never to marry Lawrence. Sally kept her promise and refused to see Lawrence again, dying in 1803. But Lawrence continued on friendly terms with their mother and painted several portraits of her. He never married. In later years two women would provide him with companionship, friends Elizabeth Croft and Isabella Wolff who first met Lawrence when she sat for her portrait in 1803. Isabella was married to the Danish consul Jens Wolff, but she separated from him in 1810, and Sir Michael Levey suggests that people may have wondered if Lawrence was the father of her son Herman.[18]
Lawrence's departures from portraiture were very rare. In the early 1790s he completed two history pictures: Homer reciting his poems, a small picture of the poet in a pastoral setting; and Satan summoning his legions, a giant canvas to illustrate lines from John Milton's Paradise Lost.[19] The boxer John Jackson posed for the naked body of Satan; the face is that of Sarah Siddons' brother, John Philip Kemble.[20]




Portrait of Henry Dundas


Lawrence's parents died within a few months of each other in 1797 and he gave up his house in Picadilly, where he had moved from Old Bond Street, to set up his studio in the family home in Greek Street. By now, to keep up with the demand for replicas of his portraits, he was making use of studio assistants, most notable of whom would be William Etty and George Henry Harlow. The early years of the nineteenth century saw Lawrence's portrait practice continue to flourish: amongst his sitters were major political figures such as Henry Dundas, 1st Viscount Melville and William Lamb, 2nd Viscount Melbourne, whose wife Lady Caroline Lamb was also painted by Lawrence. The king commissioned portraits of his daughter-in-law Caroline, the estranged wife of the Prince of Wales, and his granddaughter Charlotte. Lawrence stayed at the Montague House, the residence of the princess in Blackheath, while he was painting the portraits and thus became implicated in the "delicate investigation" into Caroline's morals. He swore an affidavit that although he had on occasion been alone with the princess, the door had never been locked or bolted and he had "not the least objection for all the world to have heard or seen what took place".[21] Expertly defended by Spencer Perceval, he was exonerated.
"Pictorial chronicler of the Regency"[22][edit]




The Duke of Wellington in 1814


By the time the Prince of Wales was made regent in 1814, Lawrence was acknowledged as the foremost portrait painter in the country. Through one of his sitters, Lord Charles Stewart, he met the Prince Regent who was to become his most important patron. As well as portraits of himself, the prince commissioned portraits of allied leaders: the Duke of Wellington, Field-Marshal von Blücher and Count Platov sat for Lawrence at his new house at 65 Russell Square. The house was demolished in the early 20th century to make way for the Imperial Hotel. The private sitting-room of Sir Thomas Lawrence[23] shows Lawrence at 65 Russell Square, surrounded by casts of classical sculpture. The prince also had plans for Lawrence to travel abroad and paint foreign royalty and leaders, and as a preliminary he was given a knighthood on 22 April 1815. Napoleon's return from Elba put these plans on hold, although Lawrence did make a visit to Paris, where his friend Lord Charles Stewart was ambassador, and saw the art that Napoleon had looted from Italy, including Raphael's Transfiguration, the painting he had reproduced for his silver-gilt palette as a boy.[24]




Lawrence painted Pope Pius VII in Rome in 1819


In 1817 the prince commissioned Lawrence to paint a portrait of his daughter Princess Charlotte, who was pregnant with her first child. Charlotte died in childbirth; Lawrence completed the portrait and presented it to her husband Prince Leopold at Claremont on his birthday, as agreed. The princess's obstetrician, Sir Richard Croft, who later shot himself, was the half-brother of Lawrence's friend, Elizabeth Croft, and for her Lawrence drew a sketch of Croft in his coffin.[25]
Eventually, in September 1818, Lawrence was able to make his postponed trip to the continent to paint the allied leaders, first at Aachen and then at the conference of Vienna, for what would become the Waterloo Chamber series, housed in Windsor Castle. His sitters included Tsar Alexander, Emperor Francis I of Austria, the King of Prussia, Field-Marshal Prince Schwarzenberg, Archduke Charles of Austria and Henriette his wife, and a young Napoleon II, as well as various French and Prussian ministers. In May 1819, still under orders from the Prince Regent, he left Vienna for Rome to paint Pope Pius VII and Cardinal Consalvi.[26]
President of the Royal Academy[edit]




Anne, Viscountess Pollington, later Countess of Mexborough (d. 1870), with her son, John Charles, later 4th Earl of Mexborough London, Moretti Fine Art collection


Lawrence arrived back in London 30 March 1820 to find that the president of the Royal Academy, Benjamin West, had died. That very evening Lawrence was voted the new president, a position he would hold until his death 10 years later. George III had died in January; Lawrence was granted a place in the procession for the coronation of George IV. On 28 February 1822 he was elected as a Fellow of the Royal Society "for his eminence in art".[27] The royal commissions continued during the 1820s, including one for a portrait of the king's sister Sophia, and one of Sir Walter Scott (along with Jane Austen, one of Lawrence's favourite authors), as well as one to paint King Charles X of France for the Waterloo series, for which Lawrence made a trip to Paris, taking Herman Wolff with him.[28] Lawrence acquired another important patron in Robert Peel, who commissioned the painter to do portraits of his family as well a portrait of George Canning. Two of Lawrence's most famous portraits of children were painted during the 1820s: that of Emily and Laura Calmady and that of Master Charles William Lambton, painted for his father Lord Durham for 600 guineas and known as The Red Boy. The latter portrait attracted much praise when it was exhibited in Paris in 1827.[29] One of the artist's last commissions was of future prime-minister the Earl of Aberdeen. Fanny Kemble, a niece of Sarah Siddons, was one of his last sitters (for a drawing).
Lawrence died suddenly on 7 January 1830, just months after his friend Isabella Wolff. A few days previously he had experienced chest pains but had continued working and was eagerly anticipating a stay with his sister at Rugby, when he collapsed and died during a visit from his friends Elizabeth Croft and Archibald Keightley.[30] After a post-mortem examination, doctors concluded that the artist's death had been caused by ossification of the aorta and vessels of the heart. Lawrence's first biographer, D. E. Williams suggested that this in itself was not enough to cause death and it was his doctors' over-zealous bleeding and leeching that killed him.[31] Lawrence was buried on 21 January in the crypt of St Paul's Cathedral. Amongst the mourners was J. M. W. Turner who painted a sketch of the funeral from memory.[32] Turner's painting of Lawrence's funeral is in the Tate Gallery.




A bust of Thomas Lawrence by Edward Hodges Baily, 1830


Lawrence was famed for the length of time he took to finish some of his paintings (Isabella Wolff waited twelve years for her portrait to be completed) and, at his death, his studio contained a large number of unfinished works. Some were completed by his assistants and other artists, some were sold as they were. In his will Lawrence left instructions to offer, at a price much below their worth, his collection of Old Master drawings to first George IV, then the trustees of the British Museum, then Robert Peel and the Earl of Dudley. None of them accepted the offer and the collection was split up and auctioned; many of the drawings later found their way into the British Museum and the Ashmolean Museum.[33] After Lawrence's creditors had been paid, there was no money left, although a memorial exhibition at the British Institution raised £3,000 which was given to his nieces.[34]
Legacy[edit]




Elizabeth Farren's portrait went to the United States


Lawrence's friends asked the Scottish poet Thomas Campbell to write the artist's biography, but he passed the task on to D.E. Williams whose two rather inaccurate volumes were published in 1831.[35] It would be nearly 70 years later, in 1900, before another biography of Lawrence appeared, this time by Lord Ronald Gower. In 1913 Sir Walter Armstrong, who was not a great admirer of Lawrence, published a monograph. The 1950s saw the publication of two further works: Douglas Goldring's Regency portrait painter, and Kenneth Garlick's catalogue of Lawrence's paintings (a further edition was published in 1989). Sir Michael Levey, curator of the National Portrait Gallery's 1979–80 Lawrence exhibition, produced books on the artist in 1979 and 2005. Lawrence's entanglements with the Siddons family has been the subject of three books (by Oswald Knapp, André Maurois, and Naomi Royde-Smith) and a recent radio play.
Lawrence's reputation as an artist fell during the Victorian era. Critic and artist Roger Fry did something to restore it in the 1930s, when he described Lawrence as having a "consummate mastery over the means of artistic expression" with an "unerring hand and eye".[36] At one time Lawrence was more popular in the United States and France than he was in Britain, and some of his best known portraits, including those of Elizabeth Farren, Sarah Barrett Moulton (known to her family as Pinkie), and Charles Lambton (the "Red Boy") found their way to the United States during the early 20th century enthusiasm there for English portraits. Sir Michael Levey acknowledges that Lawrence is still dismissed by some art historians; his explanation is that "He was a highly original artist, quite unexpected on the English scene: self-taught, self-absorbed in perfecting his own personal style, and in effect self-destructing, since he left behind no significant followers or creative influence. Leaving aside Sargent, his sole successor has been not in painting, but in fashionable, virtuoso photography."[37]
The most extensive collections of Lawrence's work can be found in the Royal Collections[38] and the National Portrait Gallery in London.[39] The Tate Britain, the National Gallery and the Dulwich Picture Gallery house smaller collections of his work in London. There are a few examples of his work in the Holburne Museum of Art and the Victoria Art Gallery in Bath, and in Bristol City Museum and Art Gallery. In the United States, The Huntington Library houses Pinkie, and Lawrence's portraits of Elizabeth Farren, Lady Harriet Maria Conyngham, and the Calmady children are in the Metropolitan Museum of Art. In Europe, the Musée du Louvre has a few example's of Lawrence's work, and the Vatican Pinacoteca has a swagger portrait of George IV (presented by the king himself) as almost its only British work.
In 2010 the National Portrait Gallery held a retrospective exhibition of Lawrence's work. The director of the National Portrait Gallery, Sandy Nairne, was quoted in the Guardian describing Lawrence as: "a huge figure. But a huge figure who we believe deserves a great deal more attention. He is one of the great painters of the last 250 years and one of the great stars of portraiture on a European stage."[40]
Gallery[edit]







Alexander MacKenzie, (c.1800-1801), National Gallery of Canada









Portrait of the Honorable Mrs. Seymour Bathurst, 1828, Dallas Museum of Art









Lord Seaforth, (c.1805), Figge Art Museum, Davenport, USA









Portrait of Marguerite, Countess of Blessington, 1822, Wallace Collection, London









King George IV's coronation









Francis Humberstone MacKenzie of the 78th Highlanders









Maria, wife of Sir William Oglander, 6th Baronet









Arthur Wellesley, 1st Duke of Wellington









The Children of Ayscoghe Boucherett









Queen Maria II of Portugal









Jacome Ratton, Museu Nacional de Arte Antiga









Miss Marthe Carr (Museo del Prado)









George Hibbert









Lady Maria Conyngham, 1824–25




See also[edit]

English school of painting

Notes[edit]


^ The Black Bear is still a hotel
^ Goldring 1951: 28
^ Goldring 1951: 35
^ Goldring 1951: 29
^ Annual Review 1830
^ Goldring 1951: 40
^ Levey 2005: 49–59
^ Levey 2005: 43
^ Levey 2005: 56
^ L.J. Jennings 1885 The Croker papers, vol 2: 297
^ Levey 2005: 77–79
^ Levey 2005: 76–77
^ Levey 2005: 85–90
^ Levey 2005: 92
^ Lawrence is shown second from left seated (number 6) in Henry Singleton's The Royal Academicians in General Assembly, 1795
^ Levey 2005: 137
^ Lawrence, Sir Thomas Dictionary of national biography, vol. 32, 1892: 278–285
^ Levey 2005: 194, 263
^ Royal Academy of the Arts Collections artist of the month: Sir Thomas Lawrence features Satan summoning his legions
^ Goldring 1951: 110
^ Goldring 1951: 213–219
^ Levey 2005: 171
^ "National Portrait Gallery - Large Image - NPG D37049; The Private Sitting Room of Sir Thomas Lawrence". npg.org.uk. 
^ Levey 2005: 198
^ Levey 2005: 201–3
^ Levey 2005: 207–238
^ "Library and Archive Catalog: Lawrence, Sir Thomas (1769–1830)". London: The Royal Society. Retrieved 6 July 2010. 
^ Levey 2005: 263
^ Levey 2005: 249–258
^ Levey 2005: 296–99
^ Goldring 1951: 330
^ "'Funeral of Sir Thomas Lawrence: A Sketch from Memory', Joseph Mallord William Turner - Tate". Tate. 
^ Goldring 1951: 335–342
^ Levey 2005: 306
^ Levey 2005: 302–3
^ Roger Fry (Reflections on British Painting, 1934) quoted in Levey 2005: 309
^ Levey 2005: 312–13
^ "The Collection". royalcollection.org.uk. 
^ "National Portrait Gallery - Person - Sir Thomas Lawrence". npg.org.uk. 
^ Brown, Mark (4 August 2010). "National Portrait Gallery shines light on forgotten artist Thomas Lawrence". The Guardian. Retrieved 24 April 2014. 


References[edit]

D Goldring 1951 Regency portrait painter: the life of Sir Thomas Lawrence, P.R.A. London: Macdonald
M Levey 2005 Sir Thomas Lawrence. New Haven and London: Yale University Press

External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Thomas Lawrence.



Thomas Lawrence: Regency Power and Brilliance exhibition at the National Portrait Gallery
Thomas Lawrence exhibition catalogs
"Gainsborough's forgotten rival is recognised at last" Jerome Taylor, The Independent, 5 August 2010
"Thomas Lawrence: the new romantic – review" Richard Holmes reviews the National Portrait Gallery exhibition, The Guardian, 16 October 2010
337 Painting(s) by or after Thomas Lawrence at the Art UK site



Court offices


Preceded by
Sir Joshua Reynolds
Principal Painter in Ordinary to the King
1792–1830
Succeeded by
David Wilkie


Cultural offices


Preceded by
Benjamin West
President of the Royal Academy
1820–1830
Succeeded by
Martin Archer Shee





Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 59122598
LCCN: n81008170
ISNI: 0000 0001 1473 2825
GND: 118778994
SELIBR: 268581
SUDOC: 030083478
BNF: cb121571118 (data)
ULAN: 500022619
NLA: 35281740
NKC: xx0132678
BNE: XX995063
RKD: 48440










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Thomas_Lawrence&oldid=790099206"					
Categories: 1769 births1830 deaths18th-century English paintersEnglish male painters19th-century English paintersArtists from BristolEnglish romantic paintersEnglish portrait paintersFellows of the Royal SocietyMembers of The ClubPrincipal Painters in OrdinaryRoyal AcademiciansKnights BachelorHonorary titles of the United KingdomFellows of the Royal Society (Statute 12)Hidden categories: EngvarB from October 2013Use dmy dates from October 2013Articles with hCardsPages using infobox artist with unknown parametersWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiersWikipedia articles with SELIBR identifiersWikipedia articles with BNF identifiersWikipedia articles with ULAN identifiersWikipedia articles with NLA identifiersWikipedia articles with RKDartists identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


العربيةAragonésCatalàČeštinaDanskDeutschΕλληνικάEspañolEsperantoفارسیFrançaisIdoItalianoעבריתLietuviųMagyarNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålNorsk nynorskPolskiPortuguêsРусскийSimple EnglishSuomiSvenskaไทยУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 11 July 2017, at 16:16.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











	Crowd Control Warehouse - Top Brand Name Retractable Belt Stanchions, Posts with Ropes, and Crowd Control Barriers direct at the lowest wholesale prices, most in stock for fast shipping.  Free shipping specials on several items!  Please browse our on
































































Retractable-Belt Barrier StanchionsWall Mounted BarriersStanchion Posts for RopesHanging Ropes Plastic Stanchions and ChainsStorage Carts for StanchionsPost Top Sign HoldersPortable Sign StandsPrinted Sign InsertsSteel BarricadesPlastic BarricadesExpanding Length BarricadesJersey and Road BarriersEvent Fence PanelsSportPanel PVC FencingNEW! Portable Safety ZoneNEW! Retracta-Cade BarrierBellman CartsBarrier Replacement PartsCustom Printing and Branding















					Your cart is empty.







































Shipping Costs/Times & Returns
Payment Options
Standard shipments are by UPS Ground or truck (depending on total weight).  To schedule an overnight or 2nd day air shipment, please contact us toll-free at 877-885-1600 to place your order!       Easy and secure online ordering!


Click HERE to LOGIN to your existing account or shopping cart.
We gladly accept purchase orders from schools, government agencies, museums, hospitals, casinos, arenas, theaters, sports franchises and more!
Click HERE to see our **ULTRA BUY** on 7.5 Ft., 10 Ft., and 12 Ft.  Retractable-Belt Barriers starting at only $38.95 each! 

Click HERE to see our **FREE SHIPPING SPECIALS**on Retractable-Belt Barriers and Steel Barricades ready to ship out immediately! 

Retractable-Belt Barrier Stanchions

Wall Mounted Barriers

Stanchion Posts for Hanging Ropes

Plastic Stanchion Posts and Chains

Hanging Ropes

Steel Barricades

 Expanding Length Steel and Plastic Barricades

Event Fence Panels

Post Top Sign Holders

Portable Sign Stands

SportPanel Outfield Fencing

Plastic Barricades

Storage Carts for Stanchions

Jersey and Roadway Barriers

NEW! Portable Safety Zone

NEW! Retracta-Cade Barrier




 
Crowd Control Warehouse is North America's #1 source since 2005 for Crowd Control, Public Guidance, and Safety products direct at wholesale pricing. As an Authorized Preferred Distributor for  Queue Solutions, Visiontron, and other top manufacturers, we work directly with the factories to bring you top-notch customer service, the fastest delivery, and the lowest pricing on our entire line of Crowd Control and Hospitality products. Please browse our online catalog of crowd control products, including Stanchions, Retractable Belt Barriers and Tensabarrier compatible products, Hanging Ropes, Plastic Stanchion Posts and Plastic Chains, Sign Stands and Frames, Barricades, Versa-Guard Expanding Barricades,  Bellman Carts, Jersey and Roadway Barriers, and much more!
 




 
We want and appreciate your business!  Unlike many of our competitors, we do not rely on gimmicks such as coupon codes or "holiday" sales, which force the customer to wait for a specific time or offer to get a better price, because we offer you the LOWEST PRICES that are DIRECT AT WHOLESALE, EVERY DAY, ALL THE TIME, with no coupons or gimmicks needed!  If you cannot find what you are looking for on our website, or are not satisfied with what you found, please contact us and let us know what we can do to help. Your satisfaction is our #1 goal!
 










 
      Crowd Control Warehouse • Phone (toll-free): 877-885-1600 • Fax: 847-991-9988
















	Wall Mounted Retractable Belt Barriers  - Fixed, Removable, Clamp, and Magnetic Mount



































































Retractable-Belt Barrier StanchionsWall Mounted BarriersStanchion Posts for RopesHanging Ropes Plastic Stanchions and ChainsStorage Carts for StanchionsPost Top Sign HoldersPortable Sign StandsPrinted Sign InsertsSteel BarricadesPlastic BarricadesExpanding Length BarricadesJersey and Road BarriersEvent Fence PanelsSportPanel PVC FencingNEW! Portable Safety ZoneNEW! Retracta-Cade BarrierBellman CartsBarrier Replacement PartsCustom Printing and Branding















					Your cart is empty.







































Shipping Costs/Times & Returns
Payment Options
Standard shipments are by UPS Ground or truck (depending on total weight).  To schedule an overnight or 2nd day air shipment, please contact us toll-free at 877-885-1600 to place your order!       Easy and secure online ordering!

Wall Mounted Barriers


Wall mounted retractable belt barriers direct at wholesale prices.  Fixed, Removable, Clamp, and Magnetic Mount.  We offer the highest-quality, most durable, and warranty protected products at unbeatable savings to you!Available in numerous different colors.  Click on each model to see all of the options!


Displaying products 1 - 25 of 25 results
Show: 

								30
							
								60
							
								90
							
								200
							

Sort: 

								Default
							
								Price Low to High
							
								Price High to Low
							
								Name (A-Z)
							
								Name (Z-A)
							
								Newest
							











WallMaster Fixed Mount, Removable Mount, Clamp Mount, or Recessed Retractable Belt Barrier with  10 Ft. Belt

Your Price: $47.95
















WallMaster Fixed Mount, Removable Mount, Clamp Mount, or Recessed Retractable Belt Barrier with 13 Ft. Belt

Your Price: $57.00
















WallPro 400 - 15 Ft. Fixed or Magnetic Wall Mount Retractable Belt Barrier - Tensabarrier 897 Compatible

Your Price: $65.00


















WallPro 450 - 20 Ft. Fixed or Magnetic Wall Mount Retractable Belt Barrier

Your Price: $80.00
















WallPro 450 - 25 Ft. Fixed or Magnetic Wall Mount Retractable Barrier - Tensabarrier 897HC Compatible

Your Price: $120.00
















WallPro 450 - 30 Ft. Fixed or Magnetic Wall Mount Retractable Belt Barrier - Tensabarrier 897EHC Compatible

Your Price: $140.00


















7.5 Ft. Fixed Wall Mount Retractable Belt Barrier - Tensabarrier 896 Compatible

Your Price: $62.00
















15 Ft. Removable Wall Mount Retractable Belt Barrier - Tensabarrier 897R Compatible

Your Price: $95.00
















25 Ft. Removable Wall Mount Retractable Belt Barrier - Tensabarrier 897HCR Compatible

Your Price: $152.00


















30 Ft. Removable Wall Mount Retractable Belt Barrier - Tensabarrier 897EHCR Compatible

Your Price: $172.00
















Visiontron 10 Ft. Fixed Wall Mount Retracta-Belt Barrier

Your Price: $59.00
















Visiontron 15 Ft. Fixed/Removable Wall Mount Retracta-Belt Barrier

Your Price: $69.00


















Visiontron 20 Ft. Fixed/Removable Wall Mount Retracta-Belt Barrier

Your Price: $79.00
















Visiontron 25 Ft. Fixed/Removable Wall Mount Retracta-Belt Barrier

Your Price: $104.00
















Visiontron 30 Ft. Fixed/Removable Wall Mount Retracta-Belt Barrier

Your Price: $125.00


















50 Ft. Fixed Wall Mount Manual Wind Retracta-Belt Barrier

Your Price: $289.00
















65 Ft. Fixed Wall Mount Retracta-Belt Barrier

Your Price: $499.00
















15 Ft.  Clamp Mount Retractable Barrier - Tensabarrier 897C Compatible

Your Price: $89.00


















25 Ft. Clamp Mount Retractable Belt Barrier - Tensabarrier 897HCC Compatible

Your Price: $142.00
















30 Ft. Clamp Mount Retractable Belt Barrier - Tensabarrier 897EHCC Compatible

Your Price: $162.00
















Standard Wall Mount Receiver for TensaBarrier Compatible Models

Your Price: $9.00




 


▪ Automatic locking feature▪ Used to connect belt ends to a wall▪ Made by Queue Solutions











Wall Mount Receiver for Visiontron Retracta-Belt Barriers

Your Price: $9.00




 











Wall Mount Receiver for 50 Ft. Manual Wind Retracta-Belt Barrier

Your Price: $14.00




 











Additional Easy Release Wall Plate for Removable Wall Mount - Tensabarrier Compatible

Your Price: $16.00




 


▪ Used to connect removable wall mount Tensabarriers to a wall ▪ Made by Queue Solutions











65 Ft. JetTrac Fixed Wall Mounted Retractable Belt Barrier

Your Price: $675.00
























 
      Crowd Control Warehouse • Phone (toll-free): 877-885-1600 • Fax: 847-991-9988














	Retractable Belt Barrier Stanchions
































































Retractable-Belt Barrier StanchionsWall Mounted BarriersStanchion Posts for RopesHanging Ropes Plastic Stanchions and ChainsStorage Carts for StanchionsPost Top Sign HoldersPortable Sign StandsPrinted Sign InsertsSteel BarricadesPlastic BarricadesExpanding Length BarricadesJersey and Road BarriersEvent Fence PanelsSportPanel PVC FencingNEW! Portable Safety ZoneNEW! Retracta-Cade BarrierBellman CartsBarrier Replacement PartsCustom Printing and Branding















					Your cart is empty.







































Shipping Costs/Times & Returns
Payment Options
Standard shipments are by UPS Ground or truck (depending on total weight).  To schedule an overnight or 2nd day air shipment, please contact us toll-free at 877-885-1600 to place your order!       Easy and secure online ordering!

Retractable-Belt Barrier Stanchions

When purchasing retractable-belt barriers, don't be fooled by other websites that sell only low-quality imitations of our products.  When you purchase from Crowd Control Warehouse, you get the highest-quality, most durable, and warranty protected products that are free of worries about toxic paints or dyes.





FREE SHIPPING SPECIALS


Click to see the Free Shipping Specials!





Low Cost, High Quality Retractable Belt Barrier Stanchions


Our most popular Ultra Buy Specials, QueueMaster, Que Style, and LineKing style models starting at only $38.95!  Perfect for basic, every day usage in most locations. Always in stock and ready to ship out immediately! Click to see the various choices.







Heavy Duty and Premium Quality Retractable Belt Barrier Stanchions


Heavy duty and premium quality QueuePro, Visiontron Retracta-Belt, Lavi Beltrac, and Tensabarrier Compatible retractable barriers for long lasting usage in high traffic areas.  Click to see the various choices!





TensaBarrier Compatible Retractable Belt Barrier Stanchions


High quality retractable barriers. Fully compatible and Spec Matched for Tensabarrier! Click to view available models.







Outdoor Rated Safety Retractable Barrier Stanchions


Specialized barriers for weather-safe outdoor use!  Click to view available models.





Retractable Barriers with Extra-Long Belts, Dual or Triple Belts, Mini-Height, or Other Specialties


Retractable belt barriers with Extra-Long Belts, Dual or Triple Belts, Mini-Sized Heights, or Other Specialty Posts.  Click to view available models.







Fixed and Removable Floor Mount Retractable Belt Barrier Stanchions


For permanent or removable floor mounting requirements! Click to view available models.





Cone Mounted Retractable Belt Barriers


Click to view available models.







Wall Mounted Retractable Barriers


Fixed, Removable, Clamp, and Magnetic Mounted Barriers to easily attach to your walls or racks.  Click to see the various models!
















 
      Crowd Control Warehouse • Phone (toll-free): 877-885-1600 • Fax: 847-991-9988

















Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft













SpyFly


































































Spy Fly
















facebook
twitter
google_plus




Member Login



 




Find Out Everything
Quick and easy public record checks









First Name



Last Name



Select a State

- Select State -
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming 














Phone and Email Records
SpyFly strives to provide accurate and up-to-date phone and email records  that you can rely on. 
View Records


Address History
SpyFly's address history lists current and past locations featuring an interactive map.
View Records


Career, Lifestyle, and More
With SpyFly you can access career and lifestyle info, relatives, associates, and much more.
View Records






DISCLAIMER: SpyFly provides affordable, immediate access to public record information. It is PROHIBITED by law to use our service or the information contained on our website to make decisions about employment, insurance, consumer credit, tenant screening, or for any other purpose subject to the Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 USC 1681 et seq. SpyFly does not provide private investigator services, consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the Fair Credit Reporting Act. Please be EXTREMELY careful when reviewing a person’s criminal history. Please DO NOT use this information without further investigating the accuracy of the information. The information available on our website may not be complete, accurate, or current. For more information, please review SpyFly Terms of Use.
 










WARNING!
The website you are about to access contains public records that may include phone numbers, email addresses, contact information, address history, careeer info, relatives, associates, and criminal records (DUI/DWI, felonies, misdemeanors, theft, sex crimes, etc.). 
					
					By clicking "Continue" you agree to not use our service or our information to make decisions about  employment, insurance, consumer credit, tenant screening, or for any other purpose subject to the Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 USC 1681 et seq. SpyFly is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the Fair Credit Reporting Act.
					

Continue

open lightbox
open lightbox



Creating private search...


1. Your Search is private 
2. We never notify the person you are searching 
3. We don't share search history with third-parties 

Establishing a private connection




Connecting to secure GEO database...




.


Optimizing Network Connection



Accessing Secure Connection...



Connecting to Federal, State, and County databases...



Establishing Privacy Protocol. Your search will be anonymous...








One Moment...



Ready to Search all available databases

Continue







Searching for   of ...
Please wait while we retrieve city, county, and state records.









Initiating Nationwide Search...
Searching through millions of public records 



Screening State and County Archives...
Identifying possible subjects that match search criteria...



Downloading matches from Database... 
Isolating possible subject matches




facebook

Person A, Somewhere
Testimonial One...



facebook

Person B, Somewhere
Testimonial Two...



facebook

Person C, Somewhere
Testimonial Three...




SEARCH COMPLETE!


Please enter your email address below to immediately view results











Privacy Policy | 
			Terms of Use




SEARCH COMPLETE!







 

	Search Engine Marketing (SEM) - Bing Ads







































































































Skip to content











Sign upSign in


 


















You run your business. We'll help find your customers.
Bing Ads can help build your business and drive your success. Spend $25 and get $100 in advertising credit.†

†Offer details




Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.







Coupon code class

First name:

Last name:

Email:

Your website URL

Business phone



*Required
Microsoft may contact you to provide updates and special offers about Bing Ads. You can unsubscribe at any time. To learn more you can read the privacy statement.
Type the code from the image:

Enter security code:







             























×
Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.


†Offer Details: Offer expires December 31, 2017.  Valid only for new Bing Ads customers who are first party recipients of the offer email. A new Bing Ads customer is one that has not advertised on Bing Ads before. Enter promotional coupon code and spend $25 (applies to threshold and prepaid accounts) to receive $100 in Bing Ads credits. Limit one promotion code per new Bing Ads customer. Promotional code must be redeemed within thirty (30) days of Bing Ads new customer account creation. Ad campaign costs accrued before receiving a credit, as well as costs accrued after all credits are used, will be charged to the payment method associated with the Bing Ads account. If customer payment fails, the coupon amount will not be applied.  Ads will continue to run and accrue costs after any promotional credit has been used up. Any portion of the credit not used within ninety (90) days of credit redemption will expire and can't be carried over even if the Bing Ads Customer switches their payment method. Offer valid only to residents of the United States. In order for the offer to be valid, a form of payment must be entered into your account prior to redemption of the promotional code and prior to your account going live to take advantage of the credit. This offer may not be combined with any other offer, promotional code coupon or discount, separated, redeemed for cash, transferred, sold, or bartered. Microsoft, in its sole discretion, can close your account for any suspected coupon abuse. Refund of the $25 is not permitted.  See Bing Ads Terms and Conditions for more details at sign-up. Other terms and conditions may apply.  Microsoft reserves the right to cancel, change, or suspend this offer at any time without notice.









See how Bing Ads works



Customers search


Customers see your ad


Customers contact you


Watch how Bing Ads works  
 








×
How Bing Ads works

















Help more customers find you
See how Bing can attract customers your Google AdWords campaigns can't.

Reach 137 million searchers on the Bing Network.1
Tap into 32.9% of the search marketplace.2
Get in front of searchers who spend 16 percent more than the average internet searcher.2











Powerful network. Powerful benefits.



Reach across devicesConnect with customers looking for your business anytime, anywhere, on any device.


Go global or localReach people in the Bing Network everywhere or focus on cities, counties and areas within a certain distance from your business.


Easy to importIf you're already using another product like Google Adwords, it's easy to pull that campaign into Bing Ads.








You control your costs

 Free sign-upJoin Bing Ads for free and control your account at every step.


 Only pay for clicksPay just when customers click on your ad. No click, no charge.


 No minimum feeStart advertising with a budget that works best for your business.









 



The advantage we gain in cost per click gives us a great return on investment — more than 35 percent better than Google AdWords.
Scott Redgate, search engine marketing manager — CJ Pony Parts
By using Bing Ads features like Image Extensions and Sitelink Extensions, this auto parts retailer races to convert customers and beat its competition.

 Read about driving more conversions







 



We might not get as much of the volume as with Google AdWords, but the volume of the traffic that we get converts really well at a lower cost.
Scott Schult, Executive Vice President of Marketing — Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau
The Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau uses Bing Ads to drive site traffic and tourism at lower cost.

 Read about getting better ROI








Better results for less cost. That's as simple as I can make it. If I look at the quality of the traffic we get for the dollars we spend on Bing Ads, our ROI is fantastic.
Alex Littlewood, CEO   Motoroso
Motoroso, a market network for auto enthusiasts, gets better results for less cost and reaches a high-value audience with Bing Ads.

 Read about attracting quality traffic



 









Import your AdWords campaigns

Save time by importing your Google AdWords campaigns into Bing Ads to get ads live quickly.


Sign in with your Microsoft account (or create one) to get started on Bing Ads.


From within the Bing Ads interface, select the Import from Google AdWords option.


Enter your Google AdWords credentials and select the campaign you want to import.










Preview your ad

Get found online with search engine marketing. Make the most of your marketing dollars and drive customers to your business.
See how Bing Ads can work for you




















Get started today
Give us a few details about your business to create a Bing Ads account and get it up and running.


  
Sign up
Get started with Bing Ads 
Signing up is always free.













FAQ


Is Bing Ads right for me?

Is Bing Ads right for my business?
All types of businesses find value and success with Bing Ads. Whether you're focused on local calls and foot traffic, or want to drive traffic to your website from across the country or around the world. Bing Ads has solutions for you.
I already appear in search results for free. Why should I pay for advertising?
Your current customers may search for your business by name, aiming it easy to find you in search results. But customers you've yet to reach are more likely searching for general terms that wouldn't necessarily bring up your business in search results. Advertising next to relevant Bing search results puts your business front and center with interested customers you otherwise might not reach.
What is the difference between SEO and SEM? Which one is right for me?
Search engine optimization (SEO) is adjusting your website to improve your natural ranking in search results. You cannot pay to improve your website ranking on Bing or Yahoo, thus we often refer to these results and unpaid or "organic" search results.

	Clicks from SEO are free. But SEO also requires technical expertise and involves some factors over which you have only limited control.

	Search engine marketing (SEM) is paid advertising that appears next to or above unpaid (or "organic") search results. These paid ads are purchased through Bing Ads.

	You pay for SEM clicks. But SEM gives you more control over when your website appears on results pages and you decide how much you want to pay. And you can measure which ads are working and quickly improve your results.

	You don't have to choose between SEO and SEM. You can do both!
If my time is limited, should I still try Bing ads?
Yes! Call a Bing Ads specialist at 877-635-3561*and we’ll set up your first campaign for you for free. We’ll give you tips on getting the most out of your ads and set you up for success. We’re here to help.




About Bing Ads

Where does my ad appear?
Your ads could appear on the top or to the right of Bing, Yahoo, and MSN search results. And you can choose to target your ads to different geographic regions, times or days of the week, and even demographics.
What determines my ad position?
Bing Ads is a pay-per-click (PPC) advertising system. You bid based on how much you are willing to pay per each click on your ad. Because webpages have a limited number of places to show ads, we auction those spaces. You are bidding against other advertisers to get your ads into the space you want. So if you bid on the keyword "shoe", you will have to beat the bids of the other advertisers who are also bidding on "shoe." You determine how much you are willing to bid.
	Your ad position is based on several things, including:
	
How closely your ad and website fit with the terms that are searched (relevance).
How your bid compares to other bids in the Bing Ads auction.
How strongly your ad has performed in the past and how often it has been clicked (click-through rate).

	The stronger you are in these areas, the better your chances of winning the top ad position.




How to use Bing Ads

How can I use Bing Ads to drive more people to my website?
Here are some tips to get better results:
	
Review your budget and bid strategy. If your ad keeps pausing, your budget limit may be set too low. Competitive bids help your ad stay in a strong position to catch eyes and get more clicks to your website.
Expand your targeting, both for location and for devices (computer, mobile and tablet).
Make sure your ads and website are relevant to the keywords you bid on. Would someone searching your terms expect to see and ad for your business?


How can I keep my costs down?
While your first instinct may be to lower your budget, first try lowering your maximum bids. Yes, this could mean fewer customers visit your site. But if you increase your quality score and build ads with a strong performance history, you may be able to win a good ad position with a lower bid. That would lower your cost=per-click and help stretch your budget.
How do I know if Bing Ads is working?
View a wide range of performance trends in your account to quickly see key stats: ad clicks, the number of times your ad appeared (impressions), spend, average cost-per-click, click-through rate, average ad position, cost per acquisition, and conversions. You can also run performance reports to get insights into how well your campaigns are doing.
Can I run more than one ad?
Yes! In fact, we encourage it. Only one ad will show at a time but running multiple ads lets you test different approaches to see what's working best with your target customers. Frequently, businesses try out different ads for specific products or pages.




Getting started with Bing Ads

How do I get started?
Sign up for Bing Ads
Which keywords should I choose?
You have a few options to help choose your keywords. First you'll want to think of the terms one of your customers might use to search for your products and offerings. Those search terms are a great starting point. Then you can use tools right in your account to find more keywords. Within Bing Ads, click Campaigns on the top of the page. Click the Keywords tab, and then click Add Keywords. This will let you:
	
Search for new keywords based on one you enter.
Search a website for keywords.
Search your destination URLs for keywords.


How can I write a good ad?
Here are a few tips that can help make your ad stand out.
	
Keep your ads relevant. One way to improve relevance is to use your customer's most popular search terms in your ad titles and txt.
Describe what sets your product apart.
Use your customers' language. Use words and writing tone that are likely to attract your typical customer.
Be specific. This clearer and more specific your offering, the better. For example, rather than "big discount," specify and exact percentage, such as "50 percent off."
Give customers a reason to click your ad right now. Offer a specific call to action, such as encouraging customers to request a brochure or consultation, download a free e-book, subscribe to a newsletter, or take advantage of a limited-time discount.























Sign up with Bing Ads to get started





































